It is but a time that claimed then overcame
Pants and Necklace: New York & Company
What ideas does a respected Africanist like Clooney come up with, you ask? More Bono, perhaps? More used sneakers? More of Bono’s used sneakers?
After some hemming and hawing, we decided to take him in. The vet listened to his heart and his chest and recommended a couple of x-rays, to which we agreed. If only humans could get x-rayed so fast!
I gave Chloe free rein over my craft room to pick her bits and pieces that she wanted to have on her card. She picked a very small selection of papers for me (all from my scrap bin), the charm, the flower, pearls and the too gorgeous Lulu Blowing Bubbles image from The Crafty Pad Designs. I was left with a rather small supply of things to work with, but, on the sly while she was at school her card came together :) She has noticed that the 'Chloe's card things pile' is gone and keeps asking me where it is gone though lol Oh the joys of working with a 4 year old who thinks she is 24!
There was some truth in what we were taught, but there was also much more. Jamestown survived and grew. The first representative assembly in the New World convened in the Jamestown church on July 30, 1619. In 1624 Virginia became a crown colony with Jamestown as the capital. A “New Town” grew up east of the fort which contained wharfs, warehouses, taverns and merchant’s homes. Jamestown remained the capital until the statehouse burned in 1698. The capital was then moved to Williamsburg and the town of Jamestown began to slowly disappear.
As in Uglies, the world building is fantastic and accessible–quite a feat for an alternate history steampunk novel that involves evolving animals to your very whims. It’s very firmly 1914, with all the classism and sexism of the time. While we haven’t encountered racism yet, I think it’ll crop up in the sequel. The Darwinists, of course, require a little more explaining than the Clankers. In this history, Darwin discovers DNA (called “life threads” by Darwinists) and how to manipulate it to create new animals, which the Darwinist countries ran wild with, fabricating animals to suit their every need. Opposition to such animals is mostly religious. For instance, the Ottoman Empire is noted to be Clanker, as Islam frowns upon such creatures. There’s a wonderful passage where Deryn and Alek argue about which approach is better, and you can really see how it affects both their cultures. It’s impeccable.
Please tell me I’m not the only Assmerican – this would be Ass-American for those of you unfamiliar with my newly-coined term. I know I am an Assmerican because I tend to make an ass of myself anytime I’m in conversation with my lovely counterparts in other lands, be it Canada, Ireland, England, Indonesia, you name it. And, thanks to the internet, blogging and Twitter, I’m able to prove myself an Assmerican over and over again, daily if the opportunity arises.
I had been begging my parents for years & can't tell you how many times I almost got suckered into buying one at the puppy store in College Station but I could just hear my mom's voice in my head yelling at me & telling me NO means NO.
It’s usually covered off by the use of the word “Banter”. It’s all just banter. But it’s not is it? It’s just our own in-built fear of “The Other” of people who are different. And when we are afraid, we lash out, and we don’t care who we hurt when we are doing it. We don’t see them as people, they are “The Enemy”.
You were there through it all
24. Walk on By…Not easy to do, but sometimes it’s just necessary.
Burlington Councillor Paul Sharman, who has been critical of a Burlington Transit system that is shunned by 97 per cent of residents, wonders half-jokingly whether congested traffic has led to fewer accidents.
beam me up, Scotty
Maybe I will be as charmed. We shall see.
This ends up cutting both ways though. Because a few days back, the Mariners had an epic comeback victory in extra innings. That game was awesome. But then they were out there the next day and they lost. People like to talk about momentum in sports, but there is no way momentum exists in baseball. If momentum existed, then the Mariners would have won the day after that exciting win. Instead, the memory of that Michael Saunders grand slam in extra innings was replaced by a terrible loss to the Blue Jays the next day.
Repetition in a room can also create movement, as well as rhythm. Similarity of elements or flowing, circular elements will give a more connected flowing rhythm to a room, while jagged or unrelated elements will create a more unsettling, dynamic scene.
I don't know how these dudes could swallow! She stared at them for all 10 minutes they were choosing and sampling all types of gelato.
Snake River Lager - Jackson, Wyoming
even death.”
Angel Six: “This time I bet no.”
Few figures have as strong a hold on the public’s imagination as Marie Antoinette. Centuries after her death, she remains a fascinating character, whose life, loves, and death have been the subject of numerous books and films. Francine du Plessix Gray’s The Queen’s Lover: A Novel tells Marie Antoinette’s story from a new perspective. Historical fiction of the highest order, The Queen’s Lover reveals the untold love affair between Swedish aristocrat Count Axel von Fersen and Marie Antoinette.
The mood of the night started out on the serious side. The Thunder were nowhere in sight to do the friendly handshakes as the Derby Darlins were introduced by the Derby Darlins home announcer to the crowd on hand sitting along suicide row and in the arena stands. Then lo! the sound of the bagpipes of Big Bag followed by the roar of AC/DC Thunderstruck and the Thunder entered into the ring of combat miming their inner shark. Missing in action for the night on the Thunder bench included Rainblows Brite, and no Perky Set in sight.
Brock: Yes, I have
Of course, Ed Balls, seeing a report that undermines his economic "master plan", has already begun to spin it in his favour. It is obvious that public spending cuts will affect areas with the highest public spending the most. But rather than address the questions this report raises about his economic strategy, he prefers to point to the obvious fact that proportionately, northern areas dominated by the public sector will see bigger affects of the cuts. He ignores the government's plans to assist private enterprise in these areas so they can take up the slack and instead claims the government is attempting to exacerbate the north/south divide.
Very interesting news article... Especially if you keep up with all the talk about how U.S. kids do on standardized tests as compared to other nations. Read the entire article. (If you only read the beginning, you miss a lot...)
Once the verdict has been reached, the accused gets NO CHANCE to defend him/herself, since the evidence against him/her must be for some reason kept secret.
I know my mother loves all of her children no matter what they do and this is how I feel about my own. But I feel she must be so hurt and I am praying that the Lord brings repentance before the end.
Now I do not want to piss on anyone's parade. If those writers believe this agent is the best fit for them, then AWESOME! Brilliant. Go for it and I wish you all the luck in the world with your new partnership.
An East Vancouver man taking out the trash one morning says a police officer threw him up against a fence and tossed him on the ground. More officers showed up. One put a knee on his neck, another put a knee on the back of his legs, and the remaining officers began to kick him as he lay, pinned, on the sidewalk.
I am pleased to announce that I have joined the design team at Perfect Sentiment! It is a fun challenge site with a creative twist. Please check it out HERE!
First of all, it was a dream, and it will soon turn into something plausible and tangible. And secondly, I haven’t even finished my first novel yet!
"wow, you really have a commanding voice!, it sounds like radio!" "wow, I never knew you were so funny, you're kinda zany!""wow, that's pretty deep what you said, I never would've thought that!"
Spotted Stella Black in a local pub on Friday night, and again couldn't stop myself from trying it. It has been knocking around for about a year now, and I wanted it to be good, I wanted it to be a legitimate attempt to make a better, premium beer (unlike Fosters Gold in my previous post), which was a cut above the standard Stella lager that supermarkets and pubs are a wash with.
Opening Night: Wed, 9th May, 6-8pm
Aligning images and text.
“Target!” Amid the buoys and haze, and against the Hawaiian Islands as a backdrop, the OOD saw the enemy’s periscope and immediately lowered ours. If we could see him, he could see us.
Where can kids read? How does the room feel?
In January 2012, Calgary-based West Jet launched a new all-inclusive pricing strategy for their fares, and this week two other major Canadian Airlines – Air Canada and Porter Airlines, have also followed suit. Of the 3, Porter is the only to advertise one easy consolidated price, while the others will show base price & other fees identified separately. All three airlines are following in the long-standing footsteps of Air Transat, who has advocated such pricing transparency for years. The changes come hot on the heels of the Canadian federal government announcing upcoming laws to better regulate advertised pricing in the airline industry.
While I was browsing at Joann's the other day, the thought occured to me to buy some fabric to recover a stool my aunt gave to me many years ago that I use at my sewing table. It was in pretty poor shape and needed a makeover...badly. The paint was chipped and dirty and dingy looking, and the fabric didn't even come close to going with my made-over craft room. The legs were all wobbly and every time I sat on it, I was afraid I was going to end up on the floor.
Brig General William Barksdale ( left)
April 15– Tuesday– New York City– The New York Times notes that “T. B. Peterson & Brothers, of Philadelphia, have now in press and will publish, on Saturday next, a new work of great merit, entitled The Channings; a Domestic Novel of Real Life, by Mrs. Henry Wood.” Mrs Henry Wood is the pen name of Ellen Price Wood, an English writer who, two years ago, created a literary stir with her novel East Lynne.
He was sick, he couldn’t remember ever feeling this bad. Every muscle in his body ached and he was cold, not just chilled, but down to the bone cold. He took his temperature and found to his surprised that it was a few degrees lower then normal. Not wanting to disturb his wife so soon after her delivery he self diagnosed, popping Tylenol to ease the muscle pain and tried sleeping his symptoms away. He trembled beneath a pile of covers his body racked with pain. He must have had the heat jacked up to 80, but he still couldn’t get warm. When he couldn’t get warm under the covers he tried taking a hot shower. Catching his reflection in the mirror he was shocked to see how bad he looked. His pupils where pin pricks, and his complexion had a gray pallor to it. Shivering in his winter robe he stood in front of the shower and stared at the faucet in confusion. It was more then just forgetting a thought, he stood there and stared at the faucet not knowing what the knob was. He might as well had been staring at an alien device. When his wife found him and called paramedics he looked like he had been dead for days, instead of a few hours.
If you are looking for a store where you can buy Saucony running shoes, you can visit ZBSports.com: a small uniquely holistic internet retailer and outdoor sport store located in Philly, PA and Hendersonville, NC. They have a wide variety of athletic shoes and apparel. They are actually a one-stop-shop for your sports apparel needs.
The books served their purpose: I know that Kieran will be able to relate more to what we see at the interpretive center...and 5-year-old Nicholas, too!
The other option is to not be so annoyed when people tell me something I already know as if I’m unaware or ignorant of the fact. There’s a dozen more ways I can react other than get mad.
UN Secretary General Ban Ki-moon
Dearest Mother.
Entrepreneurship
Here's an almost shameless plug for Two Guys In Sanity, complete with highly informative information from our Band Information Band Page! If you haven’t already listened to our new track (along with, perhaps, the older ones), I suggest (*completely* without bias, of course!) that you give it a spin.
When danger’s near, exploit their fear,
Last week's challenge for FCCB was "April Showers". Quite fitting, don't you think? I was on the DT scheduled to post for that challenge and unfortunately, I didn't get my project done on time; however, I do have it now and would love to share it with you! I hope you enjoy it and thanks for peeking at it. ;)
It feels weird that I'm the same weight I was pre-pregnancy, but my body is not the same shape. My clothes all fit different, and I have a pouch on my lower belly. I'm hoping exercise will help me firm that up some... we'll see.
The prize!
Cool stuff that was too "girly" for my house (which simply means my boys would not like it, perhaps your boys would):
and still no hidden truths could I unfold
It has taken a little while to get used to the school drop off and pick up business, as well as only having one little 'helper' at home on those days instead of two, but all in all, I think our family is adjusting well to the changes. I'm certainly noticing how much more I'm getting done at home and that I'm not nearly as exhausted as I was with that horrid commute each week. I know that people do travel for work all the time, but leaving the farm at 7.20am with two little boys, a 150km round trip and arriving home until 6pm was really more trouble than it was worth.
Craving company and warmth
The advantages and the disadvantages of writing on the computer lies in the internet.
Asheton and his drumming brother Scott formed the Psychedelic Stooges in 1967 with vocalist Iggy Pop and bassist Dave Alexander. The Stooges’ self-titled debut (1969) and Fun House (1970) helped lay the foundation for punk rock. Alexander was fired in 1970 and he died of alcohol-related causes in 1975. Asheton moved to bass for 1973’s Raw Power, making room for guitarist James Williamson.
I just wish you'd watch your words
My grandpa actually used to harness race when he was younger!! He has raced at Scioto Downs and tons of other tracks in Michigan and Ohio. He won first place in a few races. The horses he won with were named Tam-O-Shantor and Paul K. I just think that is so awesome! He is adorable because he is super proud of it and doesn't hesitate to tell you all about it. I wish y'all could come with me to listen to his stories!!! I will try to take some pictures of the pictures he has of him racing and posing with the horses so I can show y'all!
If your a writer, you’ll know that sometimes you just have to write. You get the itch, and you scratch it.
~Dawn
Spinach (finely chopped)
Once everybody lands, no one is in any immediate danger except for Ganju and Ichigo. Chad causes an enormous crater but finds shelter in a tree before any shinigami can arrive at the scene. Uryu and Orihime have shelter and no one suspects Yoruichi of being anything since he’s a cat. However, the second they land Ichigo and Ganju are greeted by two members of the eleventh squad, Ikkaku Madarame and Yumichika Ayasegawa. Ganju knows that he’s outclassed and runs away (while being chased by Yumichika). His story in the volume ends with him being cornered at a massive pit where Yumichika offers him to either by his sword or to fall to his death in the pit. Ichigo chooses to stay and fight Ikkaku. They draw first blood simultaneously with both striking a blow on the other. However, Ikkaku reveals that he hasn’t shown his zanpakuto‘s named shenkai form yet which is a spear that also funcftions as a nunchuk spear thing (and is the coolest shenkai yet). He proceeds to beat the holy hell out of Ichigo until he slices open Ichigo’s arm which brings out Ichigo’s survival instinct and he turns the tables on Ikkaku and appears to kill him when Ikkaku turns down an offer to surrender after being critically wounded.
Follow Me (sew_N_time) on Twitter (2 entries)
Thank you to everyone for their well-wishes during my housing crisis and thank you for the great suggestions for sports players prior to 1960. If you think of any more, let me know!~
“…much of the charm of the production has to do with its atmosphere of chaos…of freaks running to and fro, throwing up their hands, and generally flopping about like headless chickens. In other words, running amok.”
All the DT have a prize up for grabs on their blogs and there is also a prize on the challenge blog so be sure to join us this fortnight if you can, we would love you to help us celebrate.
So this week we're trying the original system again. Get all your chores done and spend a couple hours in free electronic time--computer, DS, TV, or movie.
The relevant section of the slim book closes when the narrator, years later, identifies Le Grand as one of the miserable French soldiers returning from captivity in Russia, long after the Revolution has been defeated and Napoleon has died in exile. The two recognize each other. The drummer plays the old tunes, conjuring up images of a vanished revolutionary past, only now sorrowfully and mournfully, and then dies, collapsing upon his drum. Heine, the former boy, now a man, knows what to do: the drum “was not to serve any enemy of freedom for their servile roll call; I had understood the last beseeching glance of Le Grand very well and immediately drew the rapier from my cane and pierced the drum.”
For those of us who post regularly (as in 4 or 5 times a week), a blog challenge is not too terribly demanding. We may have to stretch a bit to post a few more days (or double-up on some days), but overall, the push isn’t that great. Many, many bloggers, however, post much less frequently, so a 28-day challenge can be a huge demand on their time, energy, and creativity.
Through much reflection, I realized that I am the perfect mother for Toph. I am exactly what he needs and exactly what he wants. I work. He goes to daycare, where he is flourishing. I go to work, where I am challenged daily and where I am flourishing. I come home exhausted, but happy.
If they had not done that, their estimation is that by 2pm that afternoon, $5.5 trillion would have been drawn out of the money market system of the U.S., would have collapsed the entire economy of the U.S., and within 24 hours the world economy would have collapsed. It would have been the end of our economic system and our political system as we know it.
**WARNING- Science content today!!!**
Lately I haven't been spanked for anything. He's even skipped maintenance a couple of times. Now granted, there were reasons it got skipped, but still.
I was born and raised in the beautiful state of New Mexico. Hailing from this "Land of Enchantment," I believe, creates part of my need for space and time. I deplore the notion of being caged in by my surroundings; and the open sky and few people, endless desert and cowboy mentality allow me to breathe freely, openly and privately.
This begins to move us into a third phase that is a relationship that is motivated now by love and devotion instead of pain. This is where God desires us to be. Another way of saying this is we are no longer seeking His hand. We are seeking Him. We want to know God personally.
I sort of already posted my reflections on the challenge back on the day of the letter "N". I did a post titled "N is for Nothing" in which I complained about the lack of - oh, what shall I call it? The lack of reciprocity, you know, paying it forward.
When did society decided enough wasn't?
I guess I can give a general update of the things going on around here, at least…
Paddington
I have heard alot of people complain about the differences between the two beers... If they wanted the two to be the same, they would have just made one damn beer. I think their whole basis of this is their own interpretation of the same idea. Granted i dont know descutes product explicitly, but from what i understand they venture more into a hop-centric brew and then lets face it, boulevard really shines in the unfiltered wheat.
Now I’m talking about the age where kids shouldn’t really care about expensive gadgets like 4-7.. 7 obviously pushing it a bit.. now days anyway..
Departure from Sacramento, CA airport was a whole new experience. A new building, new shuttle, new sculpture. I had to relearn my way around. I don’t know what the exciting rabbit sculpture is made of but it looks like papier mache’, and isn’t he grand?
To grey
After that I tried a mix of watercolor with a little bit of ink and tea. It takes longer than watercolor to dry, but the ‘ink’ felt good to sketch/paint with.
5. Emika - pretend
For the Lord Most High is awesome;
As a bit of a postscript, when Thanksgiving rolled around, my son-in-law came over from Camp Pendleton where he's preparing for another all-expense paid trip overseas do defend the rest of us. I stopped by OWB and grabbed another bomber of Eclipse for him to enjoy during his short stay. He's now back at Pendleton and I didn't get any definitive feedback on the Eclipse - Marines are men of few words - but I suppose it was okay, since it disappeared pretty fast.
The BEST gift you can get your Mother this Mother's Day season is a personalized heirloom like the ones Jessica makes!! Get your order in soon and she will amaze you with her talent.
* Cuepacs President Omar Osman revealed that a total of 418,200 or 41 per cent of the 1.2 million civil servants in the country were suspected to be involved in corruption last year (Bernama, 2 June 2010).
But since I started EN's Manicure course I can finally do it! Hooray for me!!! Once I'd watched the dvd I gave myself a french mani for the first time! Ive only given myself two so they are'nt perfect but I am so pleased! Looking back I'm not sure what I found so difficult :)
So I’m taking tomorrow and the weekend offline and I’m giddy as hell about it. Have a glorious weekend and don’t be jelly. My life is rarely this carefree.
Some people’s sailing habits are really a greater portion of a challenge compared to the vessel these are sailing on. Will you be a conservative sailor or maybe a hell bent for leather go fast racer? Pushing boats hard offshore is fine for racers with accounts loaded by corporate sponsors but when looking at cruising yourself vessel hap-hazard sailing skills and poor seamanship will drastically deflate your budget in a hurry and also use a negative impact on the safety factor.
Just like stepfamily issues, end-of-life issues are incredibly challenging to discuss with your partner, but they are critical. Have both of you created advance care directives so your partner knows how you want to be taken care of if you can’t speak for yourself? (Only 18% of American adults have completed theirs.) How about your estate planning? It gets complicated in stepfamilies. Have you planned your funeral so your spouse doesn’t have to?
At night when
Within European societies – in a post-9/11 world – there is a greater move towards homogeneity, towards integration around a set of “common values”, and an increasing intolerance of cultural difference, of otherness.
Endre beeing high on sugar after a birthday party...
It was known that Abu Qatada was running the al Qaeda cells in Spain and Germany from London. The two terrorists who bombed Mike’s Place in Tel Aviv were Muslims with British passports.
Every now and then I make a batch of beads and components that I don't really want to part with, and this is pretty much one of those batches. I have to remind myself that I need to eat and pay bills so hoarding them away is not really an option. At least I can always make them again, right?
"Genesis Of The Daleks" has been voted the best Dr.Who story by fans. It’s pretty good. It keeps the traditional Dr.Who values of almost no budget, shockingly bad acting from the minor characters, sets that wobble and monsters that are genuinely scary.
“You can sit as before.
Love mum
We spent the weekend camping at Basswoods Resort in Platte City. On the way there my kids asked if I was running in a race. The last 3 trips out of town were for races and they were glad we were just going for the fun of it. I actually can't call it camping but we did sleep in the camper. It is a nice RV park, but they really pack you in there. We only had about 8-10 feet between us and the other campers. The kids spent a good portion of the weekeend at the pool there and playing in the splash park. The boys and I went fishing for 3 hours on Saturday and had a blast. We mostly caught Bluegill but they were nice sized. I let Corbin hold my rod for a second while I was fixing his and he hooked on a nice sized Largemouth. He got a bit too excited once he had him by the bank and dropped the rod tip down and the line snapped so we never got our hands on him. It was a 3 or 4 lb bass and I only had 5lb test on the reel so ther wasn't much room for error.
Well, never mind that everybody and their grandmother is on Pinterest now (I'm serious. I know grandmothers on Pinterest) but "pinning" has become as much of a household word as "Facebooking" someone or "Googling" something. Aaaand apparently the selective period is over since I recently got a shitload of hate comments on one of my pins. Seriously, who does that? Pinterest began as such a grown-up place to get ideas on pimping your house and making your own make-up from scratch, and all of a sudden people look at a before-and-after pic of a chick (not me!) who lost weight and got ridic in shape and are like "Sorry, I don't think that's possible." Wha? I just wanted to pin it for inspiration. Now I have 35 comments of people basically arguing whether it's possible or not and 400something repins (all of which were getting emailed to me when repinned.) Get off my pin, people!
Otherwise, I’m not sure exactly how Krog is approaching the interrogation, but I’m concerned that he might be trying to be a little too white hat about the whole thing. I told him the old saying, you can catch more flies with honey than with vinegar…point being, maybe he should cover the Grimtotem guy with honey, then tie him down in one of those areas in the swamp that’s swarming with giant flies. That might get him talking a little faster.
There is no one template. There is no magic set of rules. There are lots of contradictions. All you have to do is find your voice and write really well. It's very simple and very hard.
I was thinking today that a good analogy would be wanting to be a movie star. I mean, say there was some open audition for some big Hollywood movie…and I went to it. And I’d studied the part (alone in my room mostly…without a network of fellow-actors, or anybody to work with me or troubleshoot with me). I’d perhaps read a lot of books about what would be entailed in the process of auditioning (I’m no dummy; I wouldn’t just jump in totally blind.) But I’d never been to an audition, or been friendly with anybody who had. Everything I knew about the industry (and maybe it was a lot; maybe I’d read and read and studied and studied) was from the outside. Academic, not experiential knowledge.
They knew it was going to be different and challenging.
Tan Chin Keong is an analyst at UBS Wealth Management Research.
Diced Bell Pepper
LUKE 12:5
If we accept what has been decided and go into the new government on this basis, we will be committing ourselves to a near-impossible task.
swallowed like pills
Mary Ting- Crossroads
The next time you are confronted with someone who has a religious symbol system that you don’t share, I want you to try and translate. You don’t have to subscribe to God language in order to use God language. Maybe internally, you prefer to use the word Universe instead of God, or maybe you don’t like to assign a word to that concept at all. That’s OK. You can translate into their language, and if your heart and intentions are in the right place, your translation into their symbol system will work out.
We're going on a TREASURE HUNT!!! Scrap about something you TREASURE and tell us the story behind it!! This could be family, a vacation spot, your home, a piece of jewelry... anything really!!
Removal of Work
Toast with butter.....
I found the perfect spot for the sign over the archway that separates the living room from the front entry and stairs. Someday I will replace the ick light fixture you see reflected in the mirror...
I think it’s good to build a fan base before you diversify, but if you have a strong voice in a variety of genre’s or age ranges, then I’d be happy to support diversifying.
Then the being disappeared from the window. In the morning when the farm people returned, a huge boulder was found in the alley between the farm buildings, and it has remained there ever since.
Whilst Ms Tymoshenko’s circumstances and hunger strike may be preoccupying Baroness Ashton at the EEAS, not a single spontaneous protest from the people of any note Ukraine has occurred. In fact even some of the western media sees the hunger strike tactic as flawed. The Economist recently calling her antics “grating“, and that from a media outlet hardly friendly to the Yanukovych camp (or any authoritarian rule for that matter), and calling foul on her damsel in distress tone.
I took on a challenge recently to go photograph 100 strangers. Not just to go photograph them, but also to get to know them a little in the few moments of contact we might have. Sounds easy? It's damned difficult, just walking up to a total stranger and asking him or her if they want to be photographed.
One of D-boy's strengths is that he is very detail-oriented and will study directions to make sure he is doing a project correctly. I challenged him to build the castle, and left him to his work.
My daughter recently began a new job. It’s similar to the job she’s held for the last 4.5 years, but it’s different, too. She works retail, and has moved to a feed and ranch store. Similar, but different than the job she’s been doing.
I’m late once again, but whatever. I already got really frustrated while trying to install my Wi-Fi adapter and Visual Studio today (which took HOURS to install, and the installation is still not complete -_-).
The only way this could ever work is if DNA had a quantum attribute, and it does. All our teaching for more than 10 years has told you that the 90 percent of DNA that is non-encoded and considered “junk” is a quantum instruction set. Therefore, the DNA molecule must have some quantum attributes yet to be discovered, but that are very real and have to do with instructions to the chemistry of more than three billion parts of the DNA molecule. This is especially true to the gene-producing chemistry of the protein-encoded parts. For simplicity, I tell you that DNA is actively dynamic and can change the reality of everything you think of as “normal.”
Some exciting stuff has happened in last few days! I got asked by a hairdresser friend to be her hair model and tommorrow I'm getting my hair dyed. I'm still gonna have a silver hair but with tiny changes, I'm really looking forward to it! And btw, did you notice the tiny box in a sidebar that says ''Sponsor''? :3 More about that later on ~
An old Italian man lived alone in the country. It was Spring and he wanted to dig his tomato garden, as he had done every year, but it was very hard work for the aging man as the ground was hard. His only son, Vincent, who used to help him, was currently in prison. The old man wrote a letter to his son and described his predicament:
After she was diagnosed she didn’t tell anyone, not even Claire or Christopher. Christopher was out in California getting his Ph.D in Renaissance Comedy, which Kathleen couldn’t imagine to be very funny, and she didn’t want to disturb him. He preferred the book-filled apartments he inhabited to the sprawling green and endless wood chopping of his homestead. Claire would only worry in housewife tones that Kathleen was so unfamiliar with, especially coming from her adventurous and thoughtful daughter.
(The Oyster)
Perhaps because Burton has an Alice on the verge of womanhood instead of one that’s a child, the demands of Underland’s expectations really pop in this version. Almost everything Alice does in Underland is every bit the society-driven expectation that she’s experiencing from the jerks back home.
I finally got my period back a few months ago (9 months postpartum), and my husband and I aren’t using any protection (except for the fact that we have an infant and my sex drive is in the crapper) so I decided I should get myself to my miscarriage doctor to get checked out. I went this morning and was unexpectedly depressed by it. You see, for the past few years I have had the following theory about my three miscarriages:
3:00 p.m. — Transferred. Original gravity 1.064 (15.6 °P). Rocking to aerate.
~Taking the time to read an extra story or just sit and cuddle on the couch.
We are saved! We are saved!
If you like what you hear and want to own a few of these rare classics on vinyl in time for St. Pat's, then head over to the Jump Up Records website and grab a copy of 'The Celtic Ska EP' which is one of many places you can purchase the record.
And she need not fear
No, I’m just kidding. I’m not really comparing babies to dogs.
Cities throughout the Midwest and beyond are mobilizing to bring people to Chicago. Milwaukee will be organizing a series of teach-ins about NATO to build up to the May 20 protest involving several community organizations. On May 20, there will be at least two buses full of Milwaukee activists headed to Chicago to protest against the NATO war makers and the 1%.
Thanks to Puffin for sending me a review copy.
The lady could have played 1,000 different roles since the 70′s, but she will forever be remembered as “Wonder Woman“.
3. Korea and the demilitarised zone
– priyar@citizen.co.za
While members of the international community are congratulating themselves for pulling Mali back from the brink and getting the Malian military to hand over power, these remarks suggest that Sanogo thinks he and his fellow coup plotters have given up nothing. The CNRDRE is not being dissolved, and its members mean to play an abiding role in Mali’s political affairs, including naming the prime minister charged with organizing elections and reunifying the country. The interim president, Dioncounda Traoré, will only be in office for 40 days, after which Sanogo and his men will again (or perhaps still?) be overseeing the transition.
Sunday 27th 12pm - 4pm
Another time, Gina had a cupcake in one arm and Jude in the other and he proceeded to grab the icing off of the cake and stuff it into his mouth. Though some of the frosting made it into his hair and far reaches of his face, all he could say was “Mmmmm. Mmmmm.”
Nothing bothers him anymore
The Philippine Popular Music Festival is jointly presented by Maynilad, Meralco, PLDT, Smart Communications, Sun Cellular, North Luzon Expressway, Metro Pacific Investments, PICC, Philex Mining Corporation, and TV5. For more information, visit the website at www.PhilPOP.com.ph.
30. The sky above the port was the color of television, tuned to a dead channel. —William Gibson, Neuromancer (1984)
Step 2: Place a gold color all over the lids.
THEOSOPHIST. Simply abuse of psychic powers, or of any secret of nature; the fact of applying to selfish and sinful ends the powers of Occultism. A hypnotiser, who, taking advantage of his powers of “suggestion,” forces a subject to steal or murder, would be called a black magician by us. The famous “rejuvenating system” of Dr. Brown-Sequard, of Paris, through a loathsome animal injection into human blood — a discovery all the medical papers of Europe are now discussing — if true, is unconscious black magic.
10 Primobile
hips and shoulders the
The new AMISOM Force Commander who has served in the Ugandan military for over 26 years will oversee an expanded AMISOM force, which will include Kenyan, Ugandan, Djiboutian, Burundian and Sierra Leonean forces.
The Guidance for the Six Principles of an Adequate Procedures, anti-bribery program states in Principle V that “The business seeks to ensure that its bribery prevention policies and procedures are embedded and understood throughout the company through internal and external communication, including training, that is proportionate to the risks it faces.” The Guidance recognizes that communication and training deters bribery by companies, their employees and those persons associated with it, by enhancing awareness and understanding anti-corruption policies and procedures and the company’s commitment to their proper application. It therefore follows that making information available on legal requirements and obligations and policies and procedures for implementation of the same assists in more effective monitoring, evaluation and review of bribery prevention procedures. Anti-bribery training should provide, to company employees and those persons and entities associated with the company, the knowledge and skills needed to implement and utilize the anti-bribery procedures and handle in a satisfactory manner any bribery related problems or issues that may arise.
“We were having a fucking tug of war over my camera,” Keith told BuzzFeed. “It’s a four thousand dollar camera.”
The difference? First, look at the size. I have photos of them in front of a standard 8 1/2″ x 11″ sheet of paper. My Passport is so much smaller than My Book. Second, My Book needs to be plugged into an outlet, whereas My Passport does not.
Am emptiness was found.
A Blunt Version Perspective:
Most of life’s wisdom is not from school
Diaper- Pampers swaddlers sensitive size newborn. I bought 120 and am still using the same size. The hospital sends you back with enough to last a couple days, so you can either wait and buy once the baby is here. Alternatively, if you have an idea of your baby’s size, get some that are closest to that size. You can also do a mix, like we did and buy some of the new born size and some of size 1
~laurengracie
Other options:
jack dishel: I'm influenced by pretty much anything and everything around me. I don't feel an allegiance to any style or point of view - I just start making things and they come out sounding a certain way. Since it's all being filtered through me anyway I think there's a natural thread between it all. You can pigeon-hole just about anything, though; even saying "You never know what to expect from him!" puts a person in a category. But that's a pretty good one to be in if you have to be in one...
Summer Kay Lawson is a sweet, elderly woman who has lived her entire life on Loathsome Creek. As excited as an old woman can safely get, she will be celebrating her one hundredth birthday soon, and it is expected to be a huge event. People have been talking about it for months, and preparations have been going on for quite some time. The party will be held at the Loathsome Creek community center because over one thousand people have already accepted the invitation to attend. The entire community will be there because Summer is literally related to every single person who lives on the Creek. And she is loved by everyone, except for a few ex-husbands.
Then suddenly the phone rings, breaks my dream and hauls me back to reality. I am no dancer, writer, painter or designer and the only chills I am getting now are the dry desert winds which have already deposited half their valuable sands on my office desk. The only view I am overlooking is the dusty corniche with surprisingly is blessed with less sun scorching over it (blessings of global warming, we’re still alive and it’s nearly May!), I am got huddled in my cashmere, oh no, Im battling with the unbuttoned sweater that I’ve got on (to wear or not to wear) and presently I don’t even know when the sun rises! Lilies cost as much as AED 15 per flower and vineyards in a desert, who are you kidding really?!
And, as bricks and mortar go, do we really need all these new houses? There is a chronic shortage of affordable housing in Bridport. This is what we should be focusing on, in areas where it can work around the town. We need more shared ownership homes for young people to get a foot on the ladder, more homes for social rent. And not just tagged on to the grotty end of a swanky development.
The first stop was the creek that runs through town. Now it is touristic and cute however, twenty years ago the creek apparently was rancid and stank and the cafes by the waterfront were ramshackle. The current mayor has done an enormous amount of renovations in town and it has made a huge difference.
I have been called an outcast, a rogue by many Aikido traditionalists for focusing on evolving Aikido to fit today’s world. For me, the integration of Kung Fu (Striking and Trapping), Judo (Throws -Ne Waza) and BJJ ground combat just clicked. I emphasize circular and redirection techniques. These are not mashed together movements; they are carefully tested elements that link with Aikido beautifully. Combat striking is an integral part of what I teach. Atemi waza (striking techniques) as practiced by traditional Aikidoka are worthless on the street.
Russell is also a member of the Bhotke Young Men’s Society, a meeting of which is interrupted by the arrival of Shushan Cats, a notorious gangster and larger-than-life character known to the media as ‘Shoeshine Cats’ and ‘Kid Yid’. The Bhotke Young Men’s Society owns a plot of real estate in the Queens cemetery, and Shushan, whose mother has just died, wishes to join the society so as to avail of a grave for his beloved mother. Russell, as secretary for the society, is given the job of organising the funeral.
Kayla fell into a disturbed state of silence, wondering herself where she had gone wrong into thinking that then human race was meant to be saved at all!
French bread/baguette
Label: Pye
1. Think of the person/situation in your mind.
by Fay Hart
this refuge lies only ninety miles away from us, yet when we cross over into the carrizo there is a feeling of traveling hundreds of years back in time. the immaculate landscape comprised of (sometimes) blossoming flowers and awe-inspiring views, the migratory birds, and the wildlife, these are the things that draw us back again and again. this california 'serengeti' is the perfect place to 'hear the quiet'﻿
This list is not exhaustive, and all submissions related to distance education in the schools sector in New Zealand, Australia and other Pacifica countries will be considered.
The selling that we observed last week intensified across most asset classes. According to Lipper FMI data, US domestic mutual funds saw net redemptions of $1.2 billion (about half compared to last week). ICI data in contrast showed an increase in redemptions reaching $6.8 billion (on top of the $5.4 billion from last week). Even with one week remaining to be accounted for, we have already easily surpassed the total outflows in May.
So yeah registering for college tommorrow yaaay. Then got the cosplay gathering at the GeekEasy Dublin City Comics afterwards, promoting the gospel of cosplay. It is all fun. :) I look forward to giving the report.
And then all his crazy friends began coming around.
(Genesis 7:19: And the waters prevailed exceedingly upon the earth; and all the high hills, that were under the whole heaven, were covered.
“I am serious. Do not subscribe to Utusan and Berita Harian,” he was quoted as saying.
This evening, husband and I are going to Manchester to a Neil Diamond concert. What better way could we celebrate July 4 than in the company of one of America's most successful and charismatic singer-songwriters. I am sure that we shall have a good day and hope that you do too.
The imposition of donor sanctions may be one way of seeking to improve the human rights situation in a country but does not, in and of itself, result in the improved protection of the rights of LGBTI people. Donor sanctions are by their nature coercive and reinforce the disproportionate power dynamics between donor countries and recipients. They are often based on assumptions about African sexualities and the needs of African LGBTI people. They disregard the agency of African civil society movements and political leadership. They also tend, as has been evidenced in Malawi, to exacerbate the environment of intolerance in which political leadership scapegoat LGBTI people for donor sanctions in an attempt to retain and reinforce national state sovereignty.
My response to the journalist was met with a request for a photograph, and after sending it I was told I’d be ideal and that the feature would be a great plug for my business. Unfortunately, rather than promoting my business, the feature made me a laughing stock. I earned a reputation within my community for being a fantasist and a liar, and spent the next two years learning the intricacies of the laws of defamation and in order to try and salvage what was left of my reputation.
Supporting open schools research
Before I begin my melancholy entry, I’ll be posting about my Manila Music Festival adventures tomorrow. I still can’t believe that I got a media pass for it. Truly grateful.:)
Yahoo has published a couple more of my articles (as a Yahoo Contributor). Here are the links in case anyone is interested in reading them.
I thought about stamping it on the back of my Christmas cards, but then I decided I should be more serious so I used my normal one.
Farsighted, the first book in a series written by Emlyn Chand. This was a great intro to the series. Alex embarks on a journey of magic, growing up and teenage love all in 206 short pages. I could have kept reading 200 or even 400 more pages, which is why I’m super excited there will be another book to read soon.
His statements resulted in a sharp reprimand from Lim himself for placing the party in an “embarrassing position”.
Tony Shalhoub and Larry Hankin were among those considered to play Kramer. Hankin later played the Kramer Character in the pilot that Jerry was shooting for NBC in the series. In that same pilot, Jeremy Piven (Entourage) played the George Character.
It seems like the whole world is expecting a baby.
First up I'd like to thank everyone for all the Fairy Bad Day support. You guys rock big socks of goodness, and tomorrow I'll be posting a photo of the scavenger hunt prize but in the meantime I'm touring Elana Johnson and her book, Possession.
Creams and lotions if not properly preserved can cause topical infections that can be very hard to get rid of and could cause scarring!
Wonderful band from Australia that I'm sure most everyone is familiar with by now. You may remember them from the excellent Signal To Noise Set compilation which was posted by Goutroy, and their "Bubble Head Breakdown" tape was posted on Mutant Sounds. Both are highly recommended. This LP was released on Cleopatra Records which featured such bands as The Metronomes, Cybotron, and Second Glance. Speaking of, if anyone out there has Second Glance's "Tomorrow", I'd love to hear it! Oh, there's a copy of this record on eBay right now, just in case anyone out there is interested in picking it up while they have the chance. Doesn't come around too often! Enjoy!
2. Rammstein – I’ve been a fan of Rammstein since I started listening to heavier music back in the 8th grade (well over a decade ago). Till is a musical genius and his anger often amuses me. Maybe because you can never take it seriously. That, and anyone who makes a porno for a music video gets mad points in my book.
With the fresh ground turkey in a large bowl, add a well-mixed egg from the small bowl that has been mixed with the fork or whisk.
There are some things about PI that bother me (given my experience with ToDo and ToodleDo). Some things are just annoying, others are probably bugs. But PI for the iPhone is only at version 1.02, so I’m willing to cut them some slack and give them a chance to sort it out. (I should add that the differences between version 1.01 and 1.02 were huge and excellent, so I’ve got big expectations.) A few of these things are:
A few weeks ago I was asked to to do a review of the My Memories Digital Scrapbook Software. Having never attempted to create a digital layout before, I was intrigued, and decided to step out of my comfort zone and give this is a try, especially since it was offered to me free- it can't get any better than that! Oh, and they generously offered to give one away to you, my readers, as well!! How cool is that?! (We'll get to the givaway part soon, but I want to share my review and projects with you first.)
6-Death Of An Idiot Blues
“Is that so?”
Turned his back on his son, dispising our sin.
This is particularly true as regards the Federal Reserve, a private bank that isn’t federal in any sense except its name. Congress cannot even audit its books!
After finding this frame at a craft store,
In years past, to teach persuasive writing, I've had kids write letters to their parents trying to convince them to buy a pet. I'm thinking of doing this again within the next couple of weeks. I spruced up my worksheet with some Miss Tina frames and KPM doodles clip art. I thought I'd share it with you all.
What matters is that I’m happy. What matters is that I’m working toward making peace with my body. What matters is that I feel healthy and alive. Those are things I want to be more important to me than my size and my weight.
but this little group 'o mine needs some pizzazz, dontcha think? lucky for me, that friend offered me more goodwill.
(I’ll keep goin’ my way,)
But here is the thing that many people don’t realize about guilt; You don’t have to feel it. You allow yourself to be guilted into something. If you don’t feel guilty about something, nobody’s words can make you adopt the emotion. Feeling guilt is your choice. But please don’t misunderstand, just because you can chose not to feel guilt, it doesn’t make it an invalid emotion. If you steal, you should feel guilty. You took something that wasn’t yours. If you don’t feel guilt there is something wrong with you. But if you decide not to go to a party because you’re depressed and really don’t have the capacity to interact with others, you should not assume guilt over being bipolar and needing to take care of yourself.
Bluetooth and Wifi on smartphones both draw power, even when there is no actual Wifi or Bluetooth connection active - the mere act of listening for a potential pairing costs energy.
Alright, I don’t want to start a cultural/religious war here. But I have to say that it is absolutely ridiculous the rhetoric that is coming from the religious (specifically Catholic) right about the Obama administrations so-called “war on religion”, by requiring healthcare plans associated with religious healthcare organization to provide birth control for women. I won’t even go into the argument of how ridiculous it is for Catholics to denounce birth control, while they still have an international uproar raging over a generation of priests molesting boys, and the upper echelon of the church attempting to cover it up (without punishing the priests).
Corruption is so satanically widespread, and mismanagement of resources is well recognised in places. Blessed as most African countries are in mineral and human resources, what had worked out to bless other countries, has been a source of stagnation, mischievous selfishness, and backwardness to them. Oil is a good instance. Oil should eliminate poverty and starvation, while opening up opportunities for people to be gainfully employed and be creatively self-sufficient. With oil, infrastructural provisions, educational advancement, social development and even unity should not be a rarity as they are, today. Oil has succeeded in tearing us apart as a people. Massive structural deformations and deaths have since occupied the Niger-Delta region of Nigeria, for instance. Young men and women who should be enjoying the glorious outcomes of oil are into militancy ad deadly combat with government; most of them experience a sense of loss and de-humanization. Because of lack of plans, manipulation and greed, oil has become a malediction, a negative product. African economy is largely consumer-oriented because productivity is not encouraged in most countries. Competitions among people on religious, social and economic grounds have rendered them ignobly violence-prone. We are no producers, but consumers (of what others have produced).
10. Two Sides To Every Story
There is little variation between scone recipes. Sift the flour, sugar, baking soda and salt. Cut the ice cold butter into the dry ingredients, then stir in the wet ingredients until the dough comes together. Roll the dough out, cut into scones and bake.
Transgender counseling can be essential to having a normal, well-adjusted life, regardless of whether you are considering a full transition. Because transgender is a much-misunderstood term, transgendered individuals often find themselves objects of speculation and ridicule.
A submissive wife
Me: "Thank you. Now, can you please press the power button on your receiver and tell me what changes?"
So with this in mind I am going to start following 31 Days to a Better Photo from my3boybarians. I love how Darcy says "Photography is NOT a spectator Sport. As useful as sitting on your couch watching workout videos, this series is not meant to be read through from the comfort of your computer chair. Pause. Do the exercises. Evaluate your progress. Mess up. Get dirty." - Well that says it all, I've been doing the "Spectator Sport" but now I have to "Do the exercises. Evaluate my progress. Mess up. Get dirty." It is the only way that I am going learn anything.
There's a version of LRRH called "The Story of Grandmother" which was published in 1951 but believed to have been originally recorded in 1885 and orally cirulated before then. In this version there is no prohibition against straying from the path or talking to strangers, and no judgement given the protagonist (who does not actually have a red hood yet, she is merely "the little girl"). This girl ends up unknowingly (or knowingly? there is a cat who calls her a slut for doing this) eating and drinking the flesh and blood of her grandmother, which the wolf has already killed. Then the wolf tells her to undress, and for each item of clothing, she asks where she should put it, to which he replies, "throw it into the fire, my child. You won't be needing it any longer." After the usual "what big ____ you have," with the "the better to _____ you with" response, the girl escapes by claiming to need to relieve herself, and untying the rope the wolf put on her when she got outside.
I love messing around with recipes, seeing how I can make them my own. I don't think I've made a recipe to the letter for a long time.
We have been through lots of different situations together,
It has reached the point that there is no benefit to be gained from watching a television news broadcast or reading a newspaper unless you accept that a significant part of what is being laid before you is pure fiction and the rest, unless it is ideologically neutral, which very little is, will feature half truths and distortions.
My husband and I took the baby to her pediatrician appointment that day. We had taken her on Christmas Eve, and they were concerned that she had dropped weight (which now, everyone tells me, is normal.) She had been six pounds four ounces at birth, and then 4 days later, was 5lb 10oz. So the visit on the 26th was to make sure she was gaining. They had us supplementing breastmilk with formula to ensure the weight gain. Sure enough, she had gained 4 ounces, making her 5lb 14oz. At the end of the visit, I asked the ped to take my blood pressure, if he didn't mind, because I wasn't feeling well. He obliged, and looked concerned. He said it was 160/110. He told me to call my OBGYN immediately.
So I stopped writing that, thankfully, and asked myself what the purpose of the Scotch is for the story. I couldn’t really answer, but I thought it would be cute if every time Jillian drinks a sip, she thinks of the flavour map of Scotch, or taste chart, like any well-schooled Scotch taster would. But since Jillian hates Scotch, I started coming up with these:
Most villagers grow their own in the campo (countryside) or on allotments down by the rambla (dried up river bed). There is often an abundance and they are only to happy to share their produce with each other and with us.
Since the Jesuits beguiled the United States into giving the Panama Canal to the Red Chinese, there are now over 200,000 Red Chinese in the Canal Zone.
On the other side, getting away with crime is nearly impossible now. Everybody has a cellphone camera. There are surveillance cameras all over. There are tracers on dollars, we can see through walls, we can tap any phone, trace any call instantly. It’s all great for stopping crime, and crime has gone down in part because of all that stuff. But filmmakers choose mostly just to ignore the stuff that doesn’t fit in. It’s not that they don’t want to be realistic. It’s that it isn’t that dramatic.
That was the pool of sharks John Kennedy was swimming in: a desperate and psychopathic serial killer Vice-President Lyndon Johnson who was literally murdering a string of people down in Texas and who was waging a sub rosa war with the Kennedys, an out-of-control CIA hell bent on a coup; an FBI director Hoover who detested JFK and who was close friends with LBJ, and a JCS military brass who wanted to invade Cuba, wage the war in Vietnam, and Curtis Lemay who, according to Robert McNamara, wanted to wage full scale nuclear war with Russia, giving them the “Sunday punch” while the USA still had first strike capability. Add to that the white hot mafia hatred that Robert Kennedy was engendering with his prosecutions. This same mafia had been working hand in glove with their friends the CIA to take out Castro in Cuba. Think of these enemies of JFK as fasces: “a bundle of wooden sticks with an axe blade emerging from the center, which is an image that traditionally symbolizes summary power and jurisdiction, and/or strength through unity.”
This is a piece of library music written in 1963 and is likely to be instantly recognisable by anyone growing up in the 1970s. Best known as the music used in “The Gallery” sequence in the children’s art programme Vision On, where eager kids would watch to see if their own art they had sent in would be shown on TV, it also could be heard in a similar sequence in a later art-based show, Take Hart.
The only way to go bridge the gap between rich and poor was to sort out the education system and concentrate more on the development of small and medium businesses.
http://www.queenshall.co.uk/home/ (Where the 11 yo is performing in his school play this month! Plus check out the Exchange Cafe where the literati of Hexham meet for elevenses or rather where you can spend ages chatting over a coffee with your friends.)
Tucked in on the end of a short side-road off Khoa San is the Thai restaurant, Tom Yum Kung. Seating is an open court-yard under strings of lights while gentle music sets an elegant but laid back tone. The food is downright splendid fresh, tasty and best of all, served with a genuine smile.
1x tbsp coriander seeds, ground
If you follow me on Twitter, you'll already be weary of the trials, tribulations and swearing that followed.
In the first book, THE HENRY GAME, Abbie, Lauren and their friend Marina use a home-made Ouija board to conjure up spirits and are haunted by the ghost of Henry VIII. Henry lusts (though not explicitly, so adult guardians need have no fears) after all the girls, but especially the lovely Marina, who falls under his spell and ends up in real danger. Meanwhile, Abbie is drawn to Marina's flashy, charming cousin, Nikos. Henry is a superb creation who not only demands the girls' attention to his royal commands but will not allow any other admirers ("Master Nicolas is a foul churl," he remarks, via the Ouija board).
Richard Avedon (1 set of gelatin silver prints, 1971)
But I have ended up becoming attached to him a lot. And that’s why it’s hard leaving him.
And finally we come to a veggie packed flat bread!
I curse silently: “Just let me die”.
Like a weight’s been lifted…
- 1 1/2 c. plain yogurth
People often have double standards when it comes to acceptance. Parents, partners, and even some friends often want you to accept them as they are but get painfully embarrassed about some things you do. If like me, you’ve spent most of my life trying to be perfect, maybe it’s time to realize that it’s fine not to be. I don’t know when it started, but at the ripe old age of (almost) 32, husband-less, child-less and in varying degrees of imperfection, I’ve decided that it’s alright, and maybe that’s what makes a woman – just starting to be comfortable in your own skin. After all, this is the only skin you’re likely to have in your life, so might as well make yourself at home in it.
These are the scents we currently have for purchase:
She slowed down some once they were in the gate, walking over the main bridge over a lake to get into the city proper. Huge statues, even taller than the gate, stood on both sides of the path.
Can we have an adult dialogue here? If you are the type of person who becomes easily upset and launches into their own Turrets moment when you read or listen to any discussion concerning religion, then I suggest you read no further.
A city whose royal quarters housed the Emperor, his 3 queens, his harem, his favourite minister, and included a mosque, a temple and a giant game board, among many other structures.
- Reveal the 5 blogs they have chosen to award, commenting on their blog to break the news!
I did manage to take in a couple of the new breweries, Breakside and Burnside. I'm not here to do beer reviews, but I had a pint in each and scrutinized the atmosphere. The typical high-ceilinged Portland style venue continues to prevail. No dark corners here, with a pint of cask to nurse and local color to peruse under the watchful eye of a friendly and knowledgeable barkeep. Business was brisk, though, and I can't help but think of myself as being three sigma out when it comes to my thoughts about pubs in America.
Until then, here are a pair of The Sisters Of Mercy's shining moments: the first album's "Black Planet" and the magnificent "This Corrosion." Enjoy!
For example, why does 1 Samuel portray the rise of the monarchy as a rebellion against God and an unquestionably negative event, when Judges argues precisely the opposite, that the lack of a king led to horrific crimes and brutal violence?
The game Alpha Protocol reminds me of the most? Heavy Rain.
A friend of mine put me onto Honeychild nappies a while ago and I just love them- wish I had used them with my first baby but didn't really think about it then to be honest. I have got 6 so I use one at night for my toddler and the others in the day for my baby. I still use disposables for her afternoon sleep and night sleep. I've also started using little baby flannels and a homemade baby wipes recipe - even though my hubbie still prefers the disposable wipes we buy them rarely now as opposed to buying them weekly!
The fourth is 1900 (Italy/France/West Germany, 1976), by Bertolucci, part of BERNARDO BERTOLUCCI: IN SEARCH OF MYSTERY, which ate up a lot of my time between, July 8-August 18. 1900 played, starting at 6pm, on July 16th, and lasted 311 minutes (according to the PFA calendar). I wouldn't have cut one. Although Lincoln Spector says in his review that this wasn't the 5-hour director's cut, but a 4-hour US version. Now I'm wondering which "director's cut" I saw. I remember a brief discussion of the numerous cuts before-hand, but I didn't take notes. It was long and I was glad it was long. One well-known scene in 1900 is the forest ocarina waltz, in which dancers dance to the music of small and large ocarinas, ancient flutes (While discussing this scene with a friend I learned that there's now an iPhone ocarina app that can be played by blowing into the microphone as the mouthpiece of a woodwind). 1900 is one of the most visually musical films I've seen (The composition of each shot seems to dance and divide itself up mathematically, like music), and the most direct when it comes to telling the story of class struggle and class conflict among friends. I'm picking 1900 for my list over THE CONFORMIST, THE LAST EMPEROR, and THE SHELTERING SKY, partly because the last two are so well known and loved and THE CONFORMIST (though stunningly beautiful) didn't leave as much of an epic impression as 1900, although I'm glad I saw it.
Format: MiniMKV / English Subbed
WHEN: I created this last year. 2010. The year I had a new spurt to draw! I need to steal last year’s urge to hit the pencil n paper and drag it to this year. Like a productive rollover.
The Thai food place on easton.
Please, hippie man, tell ME what *I* like because I have no idea.
Officers pulled Robinson over down the road, quickly noticing “a strong odor of alcohol on his person and bloodshot, glassy eyes,” according to the arrest report.
it's taking my thoughts from paper to lips
Dear Query Shark,
-black dress
*Crumble sausage into a large skillet; add onion. Cook over medium heat until meat is no longer pink; drain well. Add 2 cups tomatoes and picante sauce. Bring to a boil. Reduce heat; simmer, uncovered, for 20 minutes or until most of the liquid has evaporated.
Although the brothers have previously worked as a pair, the Commodore has now made Charlie the lead man. Charlie is older, more brutal, more heartless than Eli, who is set up as a fairly traditional fat baddy – brutal childhood, latches onto protection of older boy, becomes violent himself but nonetheless still feels the beating of his tender little heart, etc. However, Eli is not happy about playing second fiddle, and as the pair progress towards San Francisco, leaving a trail of dead bodies in their wake, he chases his tail through an ongoing internal debates about giving up the killing life. After Charlie gets himself outfitted one day Eli finds himself quite taken with the idea of owning a store. This is his vision of settling down, which goes alongside his vision of a suitable woman to settle down with (the few women he tries to attract/buy en route are not really the settling type).
January: Ron Asheton, Steve Edgson, Dave Dee, John Martyn
That's hard.
Apologies for the lack of photos, we were greedy and ate all the biscuits before thinking to snap pics. Images to come when we've made more biscuits.
3) With no drunken incidents and embarrassing behaviour my new colleagues will get to know the real me – not the crazy, unstable and self-destructive drunken me.
–not much in the way of tutorials
Here in my kitchen where I'm familiar with every brand
NO Canopy, porch, awning installation
She was represented at the hearing by her husband, Patrick Harrington, the general secretary of the BNP-affiliated union Solidarity.
We analysed what made them work, talked about structure and word length, ways of planning and plotting and just giving it a go. We talked about getting published, approaching agents and joining helpful groups like SCWBI. Maurice Lyon, editorial director at Frances Lincoln Children’s Books was kind enough to come and share his wisdom about all aspects of children’s publishing (I learned a few things!).
This is one of those dishes that brings backs childhood memories. Well, actually, teenager memories. See, during our high school and college days, our house was one of the houses where my brother's and my friends just seemed to gather. Especially during our college breaks, Mom was never sure how many people she was going to have around for dinner. There always seemed to be one or two (or more) impromptu additions at the dinner table! I like these memories. I like that our house was that 'comfortable.'
Carver Young dreams of becoming a detective, despite growing up in an orphanage with only crime novels to encourage him. But when he is adopted by Detective Hawking of the world famous Pinkerton Agency, Carver is given not only the chance to find his biological father, he finds himself smack in the middle of a real life investigation: tracking down a vicious serial killer who has thrown New York City into utter panic. When the case begins to unfold, however, it’s worse than he could have ever imagined, and his loyalty to Mr. Hawking and the Pinkertons comes into question. As the body count rises and the investigation becomes dire, Carver must decide where his true loyalty lies. Full of whip-smart dialogue, kid-friendly gadgets, and featuring a then New York City Police Commissioner Teddy Roosevelt, Ripper challenges everything you thought you knew about the world’s most famous serial killer.
Adelyn is understanding us more and more lately. She will come crawling to us when asked. Will "cheers" our glasses at dinner. Can sign "all done" and "more". Wave hi and bye. Can pet Maya when asked (and will be gentle doing it!) She will always give us kisses on the mouth when asked and is half way to "blowing" kisses when prompted. (she gets her hand to her mouth but has yet to "blow" the kiss away). Addie can also hand us things on command and follow simple commands such as "drink your milk" and so much more! It is amazing to think that just a year ago she was a newborn who couldn't do much of anything but sleep, eat and poop. :)
The rural farmers always said it happened to remind folks what Easter was about.
The ideology and group think resident among central bankers, however, says “halt, you can still develop infrastructure, but you must be disciplined by the ‘Father Knows Best’ wisdom of the markets.” This is highly problematic. First, it suggests there is something intrinsic to markets that always makes for better decisions than public sector managers. In effect, we are told that we must pay a fee (de facto tax) to private banks in the form of the higher prices they charge for credit over what states can as the price for the private sector’s ‘superior’ capacities of decision making on investments.
The Sport’s Festival comprised of many team games such as the three-legged race and an adaption of this involving the whole class (not so sure how many legs but I called it the 17 legged race!) Many students ran barefoot in their relay races. Each class had to skip over, in unison, a long skipping rope. One class managed over a 100 skips before the rope was tripped! The teachers and parents joined in a tug of war and also teachers ran several of the relay races.
Baby boys traditionally wear blue however blue is considered to be the least "gender specific" colour having equal appeal to both men and women.
21. Destiny - Clothesline
Chant: "money for jobs and education, not for war and occupation!"
05 - Three O'clock In The Morning
And on the heels of yielding comes the peace of Christ.
“They don’t really understand their body is being put in a very broken down state by training hard. When you tell somebody from doing five or six sessions a week to do three, it messes with their psychology. They need to have more recovery in between their sessions. But because they read some pro body builder’s training session they go, ‘If I’m going to look like that, then that’s what I have got to do,’ The difference is, that pro body builder more than likely, would be using some very advanced supplementations and whatever is necessary to try and get that size.’ he says, alluding to steroids.
Page Item Description Price
The efforts for privatization have gotten two major boosts recently (and yes, I am keeping track; it's just been really busy in my job, the money-making part of my booze-centered life -- my apologies for not keeping up here). One was related to the misbegotten wine kiosks (which I did predict would be a "public relations disaster for the PLCB", though that didn't take much brainpower), and I'll talk about that in a separate post; the other was a far-flying boomerang that came back and caught the PLCB in the back of the head.
Pan di Spagna may literally be translated as "bread of Spain" but between you and I, you can just call it a sponge cake.
Here is Mervy discovering a Christmas tree for the first time!!
When Peaches and I got into our stupidest fight ever, I took the high road. It wasn't easy because it would have felt SO good to just yell at her and tell her how immature she's acting and to grow up, but it would've done me no good. I probably would've gotten a headache from yelling at her and lost my voice. I know my words would have not been thought over, so why bother? I'll just be nice and wait for the universe to show her what real life is. When Dirty and I get into arguments, I always take the high road. I'll walk away and not push his buttons to get him to speak, it never works anyway. Things weren't always like that, there was a time I didn't realize he needed some time to chill out and not talking to me for a while is his way of cooling down. I get it now, despite me thinking it's immature, it's his way. Not my place to say it's right or wrong.
It's all relative, isn't it?
Happy birthday, Monkeyrotica, I hope you enjoyed our evening out! I wouldn't have missed any of its flavors, sour or sweet. Much love to you.
This yarn is a glorious 100% superwash fine merino wool in worsted weight. It is sold in a standard 218 yards per 100 grams skein and comes in 56 different lovely colors.
To enter to win, please like Minikin on FB, follow them on Twitter, and visit their website. Then leave a comment on this post letting me know your favorite Minikin item. The deadline for entries will be Thursday, February 23rd at 11:59 pm, and I will announce a winner the following day. Good luck!
The infatuations that infrequently take control of me are usually (but not always) music related. Countless times in the last 40 years of buying and listening to music, I have found myself needing to hear every album or CD a band has released. I’ll also have to track down all books written about that particular group or artist, and travel to see them perform live. Some early infatuations lasted for years (Grateful Dead), other times it lasts only three or four weeks (Rockabilly legend Charlie Feathers). Then I return to my normal listening habits. I have also done an extended immersion where, 24/7, I play nothing but a certain artist or group. A music immersion is a “burst” within an infatuation. An example of a musical immersion would be when you wake up and the first music you put on the stereo, ipod or computer is your current infatuation. You listen to their music while driving your car; it continues to be played at your place of work and is also heard when you get home in the evening. I’ve gone weeks with an immersion (Muslimgauze), until I feel that I have an initial understanding of their sound and history. Through the years, immersions have happened when an artist that I’m not familiar with (guitarist Derek Bailey) interests me, or there is someone I already like but realize I need to hear the rest of their extensive catalogue (The Fall). Currently, I am infatuated with the Blue Note jazz record label. Specifically, I’m immersed in everything they released from 1957 to 1967 by sax men Hank Mobley and Tina Brooks, pianist Sonny Clark and guitarist Grant Green. I’m not new to this period of jazz, but have realized that I had missed a lot of great music from that era by concentrating on established performers like Art Blakey or Dexter Gordon. This current immersion has been going on for about three weeks, and it could continue for quite a while—or it could end as quickly as it began.
At the end of every lesson, you will be given a short quiz to test your knowledge of the material presented in every module. These lesson quizzes will help you prepare for the 10 question module quizzes and ultimately for the final exam. You will be able to view every assessment result, which answers you got wrong and right, and feedback as to why the right answer is the most correct.
“You have to carefully assess costs and benefits,” Lieber said.
Om falls in love with one of the big stars of the time, Shantipriya or Shanti, played by Deepika Padukone. Naturally, since this is after all Bollywood, such a romance is destined to face obstacles, as Shantipriya is a big star and Om is a nobody.
Pour wet ingredients into dry and mix well.
How did that happen?
4. Heal Broken Hearts Video Training and Exercises
"Susie, Susie, Susie. What am I going to do with you?"
I ate a lot of small servings of spaghetti. I should have just got one huge one. I didn’t feel suer stuffed or anything, so I don’t know how much I actually ate. That’s why I hate grains. They induce a black hole of hunger.
their dad's worked the cattle
Thank heavens there have been few films since then that have portrayed prostitution as a rather glam career option.
“We are excited to add her dynamic voice to the Fox News line-up,” he boasted.
06. Magic Fingers
Another perfume sample? A lot of Glossyboxers are going to be angry with this...
(Shhh, Kianna. Don’t tell your mom. And don’t let her read what comes later).
Judge Edward L. Hogshire recently denied motions to dismiss the charges against the defendants — Michael J. Tocci, Marcela T. Liguria, John Francis Valosky, Bonnie E. Baird, John E. Curry IV and Turner Barringer.
need peace? Jesus is the prince of peace.
She is marvelously enthusiastic about reading, writing, and evaluating literature. Her speaking voice is exquisite and she had me chomping at the bit to return to a novel I previously couldn't read 50 pages of! This month's book? The Thousand Autumns of Jacob de Zoet by David Mitchell. Publisher's Weekly calls it a "big, dense historical ... with literary brawn and stylistic panache." Is that great? What a fabulous description. I think I'll hang on til May when I'll be going north to see family and devote the week to it. Have any of you read it yet? I'd love to hear what you think.
Neil Young Like a hurricane US
What time is it? What time are we supposed to be done? Okay, well we’re going to do six songs instead of five.
In my life
A UN trooper, who declined to be named, struggled to hold back the jostling crowd with a hard plastic shield.
10. Crazy (Livin' Blues, Christiansen) 4:05
The Ophthalmologists considered the idea shortsighted.
Baby Sweet 1/2
“Stop and watch this, it’s going to be funny,” Martucci said to a fellow deputy at the jail, the sheriff’s report said.
The Secret Service official, who spoke on condition of anonymity to discuss ongoing investigations, said the agency is trying to determine whether the reports are accurate.
This is a follow-up to last week’s article about the loneliness that Social Media is supposedly creating. “A few years ago I had an interview for a job at one of the leading academic departments in my field. Maybe because I knew that I wasn’t likely to be offered the job, I saw the day as a relaxed opportunity to meet people carrying out interesting research. My comfort with the day was shaken, however, when a faculty member showed me ongoing research on avatars — bots — designed to interact with (and provide therapy for) human children with autism. I squirmed. I squinted. I tried to voice my discomfort. I lost my voice. I turned away. I was shaken for the rest of the day and on my way back. That flickering image of the bot we’d one day turn our children over to still haunts me.”
This morning after my refusal to have a good morning nap we went to mother’s group at the hospital. Mummy spoke to the midwife and some of the other mum’s about my refusal to sleep and her inability to hear me cry. The midwife that runs the group told mummy that I am to young to cry to sleep and that she should wait a while before she does controlled crying with me. I am happy with that assessment and anyway I like sleeping in their bed.
6. Carrot pack
So, in my mind, as juvenile as it is, “I heart you” isn’t so bad. It’s a little more than half way up the love ladder.
As more and more Africans are becoming more knowledgeable about the scientific and medical implications of infertility, ART products and professional services are gradually gaining entrance into the African Market.
Getty Museum
Kilpatrick adds, “The tone we had going didn’t lend itself to typical supernatural stories.”
I feel like my peers are totally disregarding the fact that our kids will have to grow up in this financial/political mess and frankly, it makes me sick with worry! Yes, my future profession will help with this uncertainty and I feel a fiduciary duty to help future clients with their best interest in mind – but I feel that my peers need to educate themselves first i.e. they need the “base” knowledge of personal finance incorporated into their curriculum.
What you’ll notice about these examples is that they do not contain anything like an expression of a desire. They are inferences directly from a theoretical commitment (belief) to a practical commitment (intention), and Brandom nonetheless takes them to be good inferences. The usual way to understand the goodness of such inferences is to treat them as enthymemes – as really involving suppressed premises. This would be to say that a desire (or other pro-attitude) is actually involved in each case, but simply not expressed. This is also the usual way of understanding most theoretical inferences, such as:-
- In 2008, Japan ranked 39th in the world for beer consumption
Happy new year and welcome to 2012! Sorry for the delay. Let's go back in time a few weeks and talk about holiday cookies, shall we? Once we're caught up, I'll get back on track with what I've been baking this year.
Article Source: Mpumalanga
1/3 cup apricot jam, melted with
They need to be able to trust you to:
In a country that is literally going to the dogs, where people commit suicide because they are unable to pay their debts and support their families, where the PASOK(Panhellenic Socialist movement – also the majority party in the Greek Parliament) employees go to the community kitchens because they are unpaid for a few months, the Minister for the protection of the Citizen (it actually means that he is responsible for the citizens’ security, for the police force and all its branches) Mr. Christos Papoutsis resigned from his post not because of the police brutal behaviour or the recent catastrophic fires in Athens during the recent demonstrations,but because he wants to take part in the elections to be held soon for the PASOK leadership!!
The simple, much hated dandelion looked stunning, as did the humble daisy, so I started snapping away with my camera.
and light
At the end of the book there is an additional section, ‘The Music of the Seals’, in which Thomson talks about the many songs that have been written about the seals, the most famous of which is probably ‘The Grey Selchie of Sule Skerrie’ which Thomson incorrectly states was first written down in 1938 by one Dr Otto Andersson, who had heard the song sung on the island of Flotta by a man called John Sinclair. It appears, however, that the words at least had been written down long before that, by F.W.L. Thomas, a Captain in the Royal Navy, from the dictation of a "venerable lady of Snarra Voe, Shetland." He published it in 1852, and Francis Child included it in The English and Scottish Popular Ballads as number 113. Thomas didn't note any melody, but remarked that it was “sung to a tune sufficiently melancholy to express the surprise and sorrow of the deluded mother of the Phocine babe.” The original pentatonic tune is no longer used. I’ll leave you with The Corries performing their version. There’s a wee bit of preamble but it’s worth waiting for the music – quite, quite haunting. Judy Collins also recorded the song and you can hear her interpretation here. Her vocals are cleaner but I prefer the Corries.
Look at the two figures named by US intelligence as responsible for recruiting dozens of terrorists, Abu Qatada and Abu Hamza. Qatada, a Jordanian preacher and advisor to shoe bomber Richard Reid and Zacarias Moussaoui, the 9/11 plotter, was expelled from Kuwait for supporting the Iraqi invasion, then claimed asylum in Britain on the grounds of religious persecution. We granted it, naturally. Come in!
Sweet and Sour
Please let me know which color you'd like me to paint Ginny's toes this special and final time. You can pick more than one if you want. Just comment with your choice or vote in the poll on the right sidebar.
Gowdy cited the “rational basis” test – which involves the legitimacy of a state's interest in legislation – as well as the criteria of “intermediate scrutiny” and “strict scrutiny,” which judges apply in order to gauge a law's relevance to fundamental state concerns.
My other goals include working at being stronger than I’ve ever been and getting to the point where I can run and play with my grandkids again. I learned that, while walking is great exercise, it is not enough if I want to get stronger, if I intend to rebuild the muscles and regain the strength that I lost throughout the last several months and through surgery. And that is what I intend to do! So, add to my TO DO list everyday: “PT workout, walk, PT workout.”
Meanwhile, preheat the oven to 375 degrees. Bake the rolls for 25-30 minutes, until golden brown. Let cool for 10 minutes, while you make the glaze.
I ran into it again today, only instead of one it was a nest of young women. Oh, sure, they might have been nice, or even competitive for attention. I messed up, doing something that wasn't alpha type. And the reaction was quick. Still, I don't care. They aren't... intended... for my part. Besides that is very easy to fix. Shut up. Yeah, that's as easy as the fix can be, though I would suggest having a number of quicker and longer adjustments. We screw up a lot, remember... 30 to 40 percent success, in and out of relationships. It was three on one and I wasn't expecting it. That's all I am saying there. Oh, my friend thinks I am just seeing more than what is there. And I will, and have, conced(ed), that could be true. Just... there is a certain tone they get, a certain way they smile a little too long, a little too much eye contact, and more stuff with the eyes and lashes... I am not a woman so I don't know the whole gig. All of those things are sent at the speed of light, then gone. Any one to four of those means nothing. A half dozen or more means something. A dozen is like leaving the red light on. They were young, inexperienced, but... don't underestimate even a younger woman. A man can BE their career. Hellsyeah. I think I can spot a woman in season, or potentially in play, as good as any. The thing is... I'm trying not to lead in too much as alpha-stereotype. That is what I am avoiding. And these... far too young, not quite right, as wives, I can see this. Playing? Liking, but they don't even know quite what they like yet. Reacting. Something. But it's darned fun to play. Or maybe I am being to cautious? Dunno, yet.
To begin with I had to measure the width and the length of my frame. Then I had to do my least favorite thing: Math. (Sorry Nana) Since I was going to be weaving a net of twine across my frame and I wanted it to be even, I had to figure out what would divide evenly into my two measurements (or as close as I could get them to). What I came up with was 2.5" for the height and 1.25" for the width. That meant I needed: 7 pieces of twine spaced 2.5" inches apart, to go across the height and 17 pieces 1.25" apart, to go across the width. I wrote it out on the frame back so I could remember.
Some diving birds, such as sea-dippers, cormorants and mergansers, solve the problem in a different way. They have strongly curved corneas, but also super-deformable lenses. When submerged they radically distort the shape of their lenses to compensate for their aquatically useless corneas.
See China right in front of you
If I had a nickel for every time someone asked me about the draft, I would have …hey, could I borrow a nickel?
Officially more than 50% of the way through the (admittedly short) game. Stockholm syndrome? Perhaps.
completed a first draft of my screenplay, finally, and it's awful. Putting it aside for some considerable period of time until I have fathomed what to do with it.
Sr. Pastor, Cedar Grove Baptist Church
The interview will be sometime in the next two weeks and over the phone. I REALLLY want this job!
and one about my process of trying to write a poem
Hi Friends
A wrist watch is a great accessory that can be both aesthetically pleasing as well as functional. It is a great statement of one’s personality too. This feature will provide in-depth details on how a wrist watch can help define your personality and serve you the function of telling time.
Do I really want this to happen to me?
An insider who rose to the actor’ defense however told us, that Nneoma, his wife is an introvert. “I can confirm to you that there is no problem between the couple. Nneoma is not the outgoing type”, our source squealed.
8. Never before in this universe has any world risen out of entrenched darkness with such speed or had such monumental assistance from myriad light sources. Never before have so many highly evolved souls come from other civilizations to participate in a world’s spiritual revival. You are making universal history!
Child Soldiers: Reports around conflict areas, particularly in the NWFP and Kashmir area, have noted that non-state militant groups have kidnapped children in order to be used as suicide bombers or in their efforts to spy or fight. Parents are sometimes coerced as well with false promises.
It's all quite puzzling. The only people I can think of who have the combination of the name "Terri" and my old email address are our old friends (cough) at Today.com.
The heavy rain we had today splashed away the top of several of our radishes, and when we pulled them, we were really surprised.
Alas and alack the rye is in the driving seat. The hops are in a binbag in the boot, hoping that if they stay quiet they'll get out of this alive -- just a light dusting of mandarins in the aroma and a hint of mangoes on tasting betrays their presence. The rest of the flavour shows everything I dislike about rye in a big way: the grassiness that's harsh at the start of the flavour and then lingers on the palate for ages as a sharp, dry sort of unpleasant tang.
1396 ***D-IX/12B/2001. “A Second Pearl Harbor? Let’s Be Serious.” Constitutional Law Course, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-14 (Projected), above, Part B-1.)
I was, to be honest, a little nervous about this particular wedding. I'd broken up with the bride's step-brother about a year beforehand, and although there was no particular animosity, it still felt a little weird to be going to a big family event. But the bride and groom (an ex flatmate) were both good friends of mine, not to mention the bride's brother (another ex-flatmate) and sister-in-law. Also my friend Laura (the fourth flatmate) had come over from America . It'd be fine, I reassured myself. I had a nice outfit, I'd know lots of people there. Laura and I could have a good catch-up.
Lanza uses physics to assert the primacy of biology, arguing that the insights of quantum mechanics demonstrate that there is no true external reality — that not only does the universe exist inside our heads, but that our brains create it from moment to moment. His catchphrase is always a version of the notion that “The universe doesn’t create life; life creates the universe.”
2) Katie
What to do? Well, kill the babies, of course. The problem was that abortion was commonly restricted or even illegal in most jurisdictions.
Will I do it again next year? I want to, but only if I can guarantee my April 2013 schedule will allow me to be a better visitor. The joy of reading comments on my posts every morning was dampened by the guilt of not being able to return the favor on a daily basis. I already have a theme in mind, and one I dearly want to explore, so I think what I'll do is go ahead and pre-write, schedule & post them, but I won't add my name to the A to Z list until the verge of April---and only if it looks like I'll be able to devote more time to reading others' posts.
(Obviously she doesn't know me very well!)
See for yourself…
In House Wealth is exciting and different because it’s all about learning to Leverage yourself Online which allows your business to grow naturally and without effort.
Sleep is for the weak. Sleep when your dead....or at least wait to sleep until March 18. SXSW week is here and music happens 24 hours a day. No time for sleep.
Elsewhere, Fr. Olivieri also points to the matter of “devastating motion”, which Bob has wrongly confused with the “elliptical orbits”. And Fr. Olivieri also points out scientific discoveries—e.g. stellar aberration and nutation—that cannot be explained by geocentrists without resorting to special pleading. Therefore, Bob’s contention that Fr. Olivieri makes “elliptical orbits” the “crux of the matter” is unsupported and false. Elliptical orbits was one of many things to which Fr. Olivieri pointed to demonstrate that the views of modern astronomers were not the same as those of Copernicus and hence not the same as what was addressed in the 1633 decree. Based on a false and sloppy analysis, Bob has repeatedly and unjustly accused this Catholic priest of lying and subterfuge. Such, it seems, is the typical approach of the neo-geocentrist.
Proverbs 22:19 is the takeaway today. “So that your trust may be in the Lord, I have taught you today, even you.”
When I was a kid--a teenager--back in the early 70s, our culture, even in New York, was highly influenced by California. If you think about it most every TV show was set in California, or in some fantastically anti-septic and blonde place that could pass for it.
You may remember back in December I had a giveaway for one of my magnetic picture frames. I have been busy filling orders for these cute little gifts and I have 15 more to make! If you like them and would like to order one you can email me at sweetteaandpearlsblog@gmail.com. They make the perfect Mother's Day or Graduation gift.
You are looking at the classic pot o' greens. This was a two-hour endeavor -- not counting washing and trimming the greens, which Cranky picked up fresh at the farmers market this morning.
I am always looking for fun ways for students to practice making words during literacy centers. I like using colorful magnetic letters. It really seems to engage the students.
Second tick is what I think is a Black Tailed Godwit, it has an orange blush kneck and white belly, a cracking bird. The feeders were awash with Tree Sparrow, Greenfinch, Reed Bunting and Goldfinch. The fields and ponds were home to Canada Goose, Greylag Goose and I also heard that Pink Footed Geese were there but I didn't catch sight of any personally. Kestrels were hunting along Kestrel walk and Skylarks were singing beautifully. Pipits were along the hedges and we were able to get quite close.
“You’d better get sure, or else you’ll be delivering a baby in nine months,”
The cold wind blew, leaves started rustling
So that’s my only credential – my one dog-eared ID card that I hope will get me through the velvet ropes and into your heart. I love this music, as authentically as I know how, and I want you to love it too. And if you get a thousandth of the pleasure from it that I’ve had, we’re all ahead of the game.
Crank it up loud. Make it HD. Expand the screen as big as it can go. I hope you get sick.
As a teen, when I really began to understand the events that lead up to and the crucifixion of Jesus, it became a very emotional story for me. Learning about the whipping, the struggle of carrying the cross, the hatred of the people, the cruelty of crucifixion as a death sentence... the darkness of all of it has been hard for me to think about.
But even before we get to that, I think this is a good time to show you the evolution of this room to date.
on the path, of truth.
Chest: 47″
996 **D-XI/12/1987. “The Central Teachings of John Keats’s Ode on a Grecian Urn.” Master Teachers Institute, Northwestern University, Evanston, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-2000(12), above, pp. 368-79.) (Hanna Goldschmidt, of the University of Chicago Laboratory Schools, was honored on that occasion.)
I’ll chip away at that stone until there is enough space for moss to gather, then I’ll let it go.
Jason laughed at my surprise, and said, ‘Don’t worry; I’m not going to force you to marry me. Not right now, anyway.’
02- UT
After dinner, we went to the Szechenyi Spa. Hungary is known for its natural hot springs. Because we went so late, we only had access to the 3 outdoor pools and an indoor pool and sauna room. First time I’ve ever been to a spa/sauna. It was so nice! WARM WATER! In one of the outdoor pools, there was a section that was a whirlpool. It was pretty cool. =) And the sauna room was hotter than I’d imagine and it was difficult to breathe but a great experience.
I guess I could keep writing for a while. Coming up with a Halloween costume is fun and a little creativity goes a long way.
Until my brain gets itself back to work, I'm linking you to another blog with a post that I'm begging you to read. Really. Especially if you're in one of those "the world is full of selfish, heartless slobs who wouldn't know kindness if it bit them on the butt" kind of moods. Please, please, please click over and read this amazing post. You won't be sorry. You'll be inspired.
She had a surgery in Singapore on June 8, Wednesday. My husband and our daughter had been in Singapore since last Sunday. I flew out there in the evening of June 7, Tuesday to join them for the surgery right after I found out the schedule for it. The surgery went well and our little girl is doing fine. Three of us flew back to Jakarta today, June 10, Friday and we were reunited with our first daughter.
I finally have a work contract. It is doable. Far Guy is going to be working one day a week for me and I am to have one four day weekend off per month ( A Board Member will work in my place.) I am looking forward to the chance to do something else one weekend a month! Oh yes and I got a raise. There are a couple of things I am not so happy about..but perhaps that feeling will pass..with time..or not:)
SAMPLE ANSWER: Refute Theravada Buddhism with the big bang, or refute Islam with the crucifixion of Jesus, etc. MUST mention specific beliefs of that religion that are testable, and not just argue that they reject Christianity and are therefore false. Explain how middle knowledge reconciles free will and divine sovereignty, and that it also helps to solve the problem of people who have never heard the gospel.
The same goes in the other direction for PETA and their sexism. If PETA is exploiting women in fur and flesh campaigns, reinforcing the current societal paradigm which sees women as objects and their bodies as commodities, why should anyone take seriously what such a hypocritical organization has to say about speciesism? Advocates of social justice issues render their own cause trivial when they trivialize the causes of others.
During the American Revolution the states were sometimes requested by Congress to draft men from militia units to participate in campaigns and to fill state quotas for the Continental Army. The policy proved to be a failure when it came to the Continental Army, being both highly unpopular and ineffective in producing men willing to serve. The states relied instead upon inducements to enlist, including bounties and land grants.
ahaṅkāra itīyaṁ me
The above code instantiates the MinerService and delegates the task of mining the web for the given search string.
Here are a just a few of the words and phrases you'll be forced to absorb unless you want to be ridiculed at every turn (actually, you'll still attract derision if, like me, you tend to say Aussie words with a kind of Hugh Grant awkward coyness, but at least if you commit them to memory you'll be able to de-code when necessary).
Though he was only three.
This winter has actually been considerably mild. We had some very unusual warm spells when the snow was actually melting! And in November, we actually had RAIN! AHH! What is the world coming to?! (chuckle) We had only two true "white outs" or blizzards this winter... so far, anyway. =)
In 1999, South Park mania was sweeping the nation. With its catch phrases, like “Cheesy poofs,” “I Learned Something Today,” or “I Killed Kenny,” it was impossible to run into someone saying those words and not know what they meant.
Louboutin, who began his career more than 20 years ago, hit the headlines when he called high heels ‘pleasure with pain’, adding, ‘If you can’t walk in them, don’t wear them.’
PASTRY DOUGH
long ago. No fine rapids chatter.
Horns sounded a loud blare from off in the murky mists and soon countless silhouettes began emerging from the fog. The first wave had seen an onslaught of more than one hundred skeletons and their ilk–but here the second attack set hearts to sink as an apt remark was aired among the group: first came the quantity, now came the quality. Skeletal champions marshaled forth long lines from every direction, shouting jeers at the besieged adventurers as further horns were sounded.
“Anyone who does not render service and neglects his duty unto the Primeval Lord, who is the source of all living entities, will certainly fall down from his constitutional position.”
For now, I’ll do my best to get eight or more hours of sleep a night, stay hydrated, eat three well-balanced meals a day and attempt not to freak out. And if I do start to freak out?
She wish, he’ll come back with breakfast,lunch or dinner.
* When you issue 1099 tax forms at the end of each year, do you also furnish clients upon request with a detailed account of their financial activity, such as gross income, commissions and other deductions, and net income, for the past year?
As cooks comes to know themselves, their awareness of balance slowly starts to reveal itself. They can feel the push and pull of their own emotions. Their heart swells and almost bursts when things are good, and shatters to pieces when things are bad--but they find a way to stay anchored in the middle, head down, with only a deep breath as evidence that they're feeling anything at all. Coercing their mind into this mental middle ground starts to translate into the pan, then onto the plate. The quiet balance in the cooks mind tells them when to hold back and when to push--be it with seasoning, speed, or technique. It's a mental high wire act that's exhausting, with far greater consequences. If you fall off the wire, you die. Big deal. If you cook bad food, you've lost guests and shamed your kitchen. You actually have to live with that.
Hilda said...
Do not blaspheme God or curse the ruler of your people. Exodus 22:28 (Note: A ruler is God’s representative, whether (for) good or evil.)
Desperately the queen offers him the fortune of the kingdom, but the man will not be appeased – he longs for something living, not for the trappings of human wealth. Stirred with pity at the queen’s tears, he agrees that the she may keep the child provided that she can guess his name within three days.
David eyed the trio carefully taking their gauge as Americans the best he could. The woman and young child did indeed seem exhausted but the teenager looked back at him in barely concealed contempt. Realizing that there were rules even requiring Prime citizens to assist American of any class, as long as they were loyal, David was forced to bring them inside his bunker. As he waved them forward, he mentally calculated the amount of food they would probably consume over the course of several weeks. His one hope was that they would be required to reimburse him, with interest, for the cost of their stay once the national emergency was over.
My teacher wrote that we should write down our personal ethics. Since this paper has to do with Wicca, those ethics she was talking about were of the magical type. But I think we need to write down ethics for our mundane, magical, and spiritual lives. The reason I divide magical from spiritual is that they can have very different ethical guidelines from each other that aren’t necessarily compatible with each other.
Snowflakes that stay on my nose and eyelashes,
Don and Wendy plan on doing many more tasting events across
Is anyone else getting tired of jeans and boots and jeans and boots and jeans and... boots?
Motherhood is near to divinity. It is the highest, holiest service to be assumed by mankind. It places her who honors its holy calling and service next to the angels. To you mothers in Israel we say God bless and protect you, and give you the strength and courage, the faith and knowledge, the holy love and consecration to duty, that shall enable you to fill to the fullest measure the sacred calling which is yours. To you mothers and mothers-to-be we say: Be chaste, keep pure, live righteously, that your posterity to the last generation may call you blessed. First Presidency Message (General epistle of the First Presidency to the Saints in every land, October 3, 1942)
Full of excuses, as you can see.
I have seen people die of cancer that were never cured, but were truly healed. I have seen the spirit of someone facing death with courage, hope, and grace. That kind of strength doesn’t need a cure to live. That kind of strength comes from knowing the value of life.
Girls bolted to the stage and tried to get at her. Someone grabbed her hand and pulled her toward the stage left exit just as the crowd of women stormed the stage.
Supplies for Card
I have a lot to say today.
While I dabble in artsy-fartsy photography now and again, this is more of a habit than it is art. It's about life. It's humor, and interest, and contemplation.
&& that my friends...
The blonde says, "Duh, use the Red Truck."
MUSIC: Blind Pilot & Cotton Jones. Saw them play on Wednesday night. It was a fantastic show by both bands. I couldn't stop myself from dancing at points and playing air bass with our friend, Israel.
I took her down to our vet first thing Monday morning and he immediately did some blood tests .The results confirmed that the kidney function was failing and she was put on antibiotics.”
Fisher Communications is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Now I want to take sentiment and other charts into account. I have pointed out recently that sentiment as per Investor’s Intelligence is not what one would expect to see at a major market high. The bull/bear ratio just got close to the key 2.50 level last week and bears still remain high at over 20%. I would also point out the Nasdaq Composite has broken out of an 11 year base. Previous highs were 2862 in 2007 and 2888 in 2011. Those now become support. The index closed today at 2991 so those levels are only about 3.4-4.3% below current levels. The early-March 2012 low at 2900 could also provide support. In my eyes this is a retracement within a cyclical bull market. If the October high of 2753 was overlapped it would be cause for concern.
You win …
I felt inspired to come up with a wedding yarn, something that would either make a thoughtful and personal little gift for a bride-to-be who happens to be a knitter, or that could be knitted or crocheted into a wonderful little bridal bag or unique fiber art necklace to be worn at the wedding.
kay.
40,000 chickens
It started by making a simple point, that a can of Stella Artois, one of the nation’s most popular beers, wasn’t actually a horrible tasting liquid but a quite pleasant drink. That despite its popular moniker as “wife beater”, a few cans didn’t give me the urge to beat up my girlfriend. It started from the observation that as a customer the cheap price of the beer in supermarkets was actually a bit of a bargain. A nice cheapish way of having a few drinks and relaxing and being no bother to anyone else.
Father, I have no words. I'm so thankful you know my heart. Continue to open doors that no one can close. Continue to prune us, challenge us and grow our faith. "I am not skilled to understand what God has willed, what God has planned, I only know at His right hand stands One who is my Savior."
Disneyland AND shopping, two of my favorite things! Seriously, if anything could get me to participate in a half-marathon, I think this could. The most I’ve ever done – and that not recently – is a 5K. And I might have cut some corners. The woman in my group who attended the Disneyland event had been training for some time. It’s 13 ½ miles, so you wouldn’t want to just show up without any prep, I mean if you don’t normally run, race, etc. And she’s not smaller than me, though she is younger. But still, I do think if she could do it, I could. And it did sound like a lot of fun, if that word can ever be used in conjunction with exercise (says the couch potato). But I may need some of Tinker Bell’s fairy dust to actually complete it.
For best results, the recommendation I read was to take a break every hour and a half and breathe. I have decided to start this break system next week at work. Perhaps this new breathing strategy will reserve more energy for my blogging which is something I have missed greatly these last few weeks. My apologies to those who follow me, I know my posts have been few these last two months. :(
© FarmgirlFare.com, seeding, sprouting, growing, weeding, harvesting, watering, and eating—and not necessarily in that order. Actually, eating should probably be listed in there twice.
My students were so cute today. They were very sad about Spring Break did not want to go. I had kids telling me that 10 days was too many days not to go to school and be away from me and their friends. I told them to enjoy the time. I also gave them some homework over the break and guess what? They were excited...totally pumped and thrilled. I was shocked...are my kiddos going crazy?
Of course, once you’ve fixed this offset the subtitles are fine, as the movie is played at the same rate in all versions.
A busy day indeed. Lots going on, mostly to do with how I want to move on in life. A lot of stuff has been happening recently, I've been learning a lot and there have been many quiet, subtle prompts on how to move forward after several years of reintegration and stabilisation in my life.
and some rhinestones to the finishing touch!
Sam and Freddie’s relationship has going so well, Sam hasn’t hit Freddie once… at least in the face. I knew a girl like that once… Well, I still do. “She’s still alive…”
For a start let’s take ‘BOW’ in capitals. Why? is it ‘Look at the freakish Orientals, they still ‘BOW’ OMG! ‘
Whilst the Chernobyl fund built up over the years will fall somewhat short of the entire costs after the donations this year, it is certainly now getting very close. It will not take much from nations not usually involved in the Chernobyl fund to make up the difference.
We still have some work to do in my little girl's room, but here's a little peek.
The Art of the Book Proposal by Eric Maisel, Ph.D. (paperback) One of the hardest parts for me is creating a proposal. This book helps break it all down.
And of course as you will be playing with the Cooroy PATCHES group, there will be patchworky things for you to buy, win and generally covert as well.
I sometimes find that the most interesting, tasty food I make is the stuff I come up with when the cupboards are starting to get bare and I’m bored with every recipe in my arsenal.
And here are more great ideas from us on the Design Team:
Now that I'm home, I plan to start duplicating some of these tags. Maybe not exactly, but at least in concept. More than likely, several will have my own twist only because I'll get hit in the head with a major idea while working on them.
If you have any questions, please contact Lisa Fraley at momsrgreat@comcast.net. We look forward to meeting you!
But that's it! Just cardstock, some gauze, a border punch, dry embossing, and gems! I think it may be the first card I made without a stamp or patterned paper. lol
Here come the bubbling scum,
Pressia lives in a world where scars are commonplace; everyone has them. She longs for the time before the detonations, though she remembers little of what it was really like. She only has the stories her grandfather has told her. Hers is a world of tragedy and survival, where scarred survivors are fused with inanimate objects, and sometimes even animals or other people. When Partridge, a Pure who escaped the consequences of the detonations because he was safe in the dome, crosses Pressia’s path her life changes forever. Suddenly people are interested in Pressia, her future, and her past. Will she be able to help Partridge, or will she be betrayed first?
1106 ***D-IV/5/1991. “Natural Right and the Nuremberg Trial.” First Friday Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1991(4), above, pp. 977-94, 1081-97, and in Item B-15 (Projected), above, pp. 297-312, 339-60 (2004).)
Buyukmihci, Nermin. “John Cardillo’s List of Animal Products and Their Alternatives.”
One day at a time, sweet Jesus
tracing question marks on my arms.
“Cherry trees, and cherry-bees with tiny umbrella wings,
Lynn Catherine Goodchild, 25, Attleboro, Mass.
Then you give the rabbit a good rub down with oil, salt and pepper before wrapping it in the fennel. I thought this picture was funny because it looks like it’s wearing a fashionable little belt. In the book Fergus says to wrap the rabbit in fennel “from end to end and tummy to back (so it starts to look like a scene from The Wicker Man).”
Recently the whole family had gathered to celebrate her birthday. The laughter, sighs and animated voices filled the house as my mother narrated stories from her life and recent travels. Working in the kitchen I smiled as I imagined the 78year old graceful woman, full of life and joy surrounded by her teenage grandchildren.
I seem to be spending tonight looking for some peace of mind. I’m bathed in soft lights, searching for a soul and hungering for a heart. I’m cold and life’s cold. My ideas are falling like my confidence. I’m a picture of the approaching autumn. My idea’s blow away like dead leaves. They blow into gutters and turn to dust while my ego crashes down like a once proud tree in a freak, suburban thunderstorm. Where do I go? How to I stand? Who is there to take my hand?
Ninth Category: “Human Society”. In this section, Adler takes aim at Rosseau, Hobbes and Locke for their arguments about the state of nature. His argument is that these three treat the state of nature as if it was a historical reality and not a thought experiment. To be honest I’ve never heard anyone take this extreme stance (but I will admit I’m more familiar with Locke than the other two…but I also admit that academia is an odd place and easily see this chapter coming out of an argument with some professor at the University of Chicago where Adler taught. He argues, as would any historian or anthropologist that society and government have grown over time because humans are naturally social creatures. He then attacks anarchists who believe that mankind can ever be molded into a being that doesn’t need society, like Marx’s communist utopia.
Combine the sweet potato, carrots, celery, leeks, lentils, ginger, 3/4 teaspoon curry powder and 1 teaspoon salt in a 4-to-6-quart slow cooker. Add 6 cups water and stir, then cover and cook on low, undisturbed, 8 hours.
its leaves are always green.
It has been a long time since I have written a blog post, but today it is needed. It seems everything that has happened in the past 18 months has been blamed on bush. The problem is, it is time for Obama and Congress to stand up and fix the mess they have caused. Millions of people are without unemployment as I write. This post is directed at the Republicans as well as the Dems. They seem to be able to pass health care, finacial reform and any other cause they please as long as it lines thier own pockets. Never giving on thought to those who need help.
By 10, I was beginning to smile about it. And I was a little taken aback by the actions of this feisty girl, all alone, protecting her property, and her Faure induced peace. Maybe she did the right thing, but at 10pm, I would have popped upstairs, closed the curtains and made myself a cuppa. Yes-the garage is where I escape from the world, into my own one, and to have somebody insult it like that was upsetting, but I was daft to confront them. Its also a pretty ridiculous thing to happen, that could probably only happen to me... hence the slight grin, its just my luck- and it is stupid!
Apparently, a group in another town turned into a social gathering, and to change the focus, that group was cancelled for a month. Only two people returned after the meetings resumed, and the facilitators congratulated themselves on a job well done. But no one checked to see why the others didn’t come back. Perhaps, like me, they felt betrayed. A place that was supposed to be safe suddenly became dangerous. Sure, I could go back, but I’d never be able to open up again. I’d always be wondering if I was being judged, if I wasn’t going through grief fast enough to suit the facilitator, if I were depriving some other poor soul of a say, if I were being too social or too articulate. (Apparently, my ability to talk articulately about grief is a drawback. Though why, I don’t know. Just because I can put into words what others feel does not mean I’m not feeling grief myself.)
“My delicate imbecile, you must know
The other thing in Mr Mahfoudh’s favour is that Chinese women find big noses sexually attractive. Why they do so is a mystery. I suspect they are subconsciously reminded of dragons, which are viewed as prodigiously sexy beasts in China. If a man has an appendage that women like, he may as well use it to his advantage.
work flexibly: whether or not you currently have flexible working in your business, it may be something to consider, even as a short-term measure
But there are other things that you focus intently on doing, like when you are figuring out what instructions to give someone to get from one place to another. There are things that only happen if you concentrate, right?
10. Sitting staring out of the window at clouds and seeing shapes in them. I was once staring out of a train and thought 'how come I've never seen a cloud shaped like a heart?'. Just then, I noticed a cloud shaped like a heart. I've stopped wishing stuff like that since then because am convinced am a witch and have special powers.
Rings and screeches in my ears,
- 200 mL Wodka Zoladkowa Gorska
For about two months now I have been addicted to French 75s. But here is my problem, they are never the same. In the past week I have had them in five different places (don’t judge), in two different cities, and they are never the same or even in the same type of glass!! Drives me crazy!!. So here is the breakdown.
Want to read 6 1/2 surprising stories about 2 surprising friends? What if those stories are written by Mo Willems?!
Feedback time came, and I asked them about this - asked if I'd been too prescriptive and directive, if they'd have liked more freedom in the form or the theme, if they felt they'd been able to make enough choices about the way their own work developed. Generally, the feeling was that the form and the structure of the project had helped, that at best they'd enjoyed finding ways to be creative inside the 'rules' and that at the very least, they'd learned that writing didn't always need to be heart-felt and spontaneous in order to be 'good' (I think the man who said this meant, 'I liked what I wrote and felt pleased with it' when he said 'good').
Many of the online hand crafting stores even custom design which far out weighs what a physical retail store can offer. And there is always the potential to get to know the artist/designer/creator behind your favourite pieces which adds such a special dimension to the online shopping experience.
92. I’m sorry, I’m an artist and it’s my job to stare at beautiful women!
I take it all back. Now that I think about it, the test really only takes some rote memorization and little intelligence is required. Party on!
no time to put them away!
As a financial professional you are privy to information some of your clients wouldn’t share with their closest confidant. Social media is another way you can solidify your position with those clients as a trusted advisor. Most clients will not post financial questions on your Facebook page, but many of them will check your page regularly to see what you are doing.
After two weeks Jenny went to a local park where we let her off leash. It was wonderful to see her run. I think she is starting to find her inner puppy. Here are some photos from that day at the park.
So, I guess if I had a dinner party would three famous people, it’d actually be five. Meh. Numbers.
The obvious answer is “impossible”, of course.
I am willing to concede that religious liberty, like other liberties, can provide a legitimate basis for exceptions. To use an analogy, people who are conscientious objectors on religious grounds can justly be granted an exemption to military service (or to using weapons if they still wish to serve). That said, there are obvious exceptions to this. For example, the worshipers of Kali used to engage in murder as part of their faith. However, it would seem to be rather wrong to allow the faithful of Kali to murder with impunity. As another example, some religions allow for polygamy, but the United States has not granted this liberty to people of those faiths (or sects if one prefers). If the state can legitimately forbid religious exemptions for murder or polygamy, it seems reasonable that the state can also forbid exemptions for discrimination. After all, while discrimination is not as bad a murder, it still seems immoral (and is clearly illegal) and thus it seems reasonable to forbid discrimination even if a faith insists on practicing discrimination.
extra cinnamon and sugar to top (optional)
On the left side again, the "F" on this horse stands for the stallion line of "Favory" from Kladrub, Bohemia born in 1779. The next brand under that is the dam's bloodline. The hip brand is the Royal Crown of Piber.
On days like these, I come back to the question that the apostle Paul asked. I picture him writing it with tears streaming down his cheeks and desperation in his soul because that’s how I feel when I read it. “Oh, what a miserable person I am! Who will free me from this life that is dominated by sin and death?”
The same pattern is there as in AI theory version 5, but I misjudged the chords a bit.
Linking up with the lovely dollimama for the 52 week challenge!
When I had the regular job I wasted 3 times as much money.
Luak also said that the villagers have submitted a memorandum to Awang Tengah with a copy to Land Development Minister James Masing.
My goal is to write one entry per week in this series. I’m hoping this is a reasonable and attainable goal. I haven’t always been the best at completing the series I start — indeed, regular readers may note that I’ve essentially abandoned the custom of announcing series in advance of writing them, preferring now to cobble series together from previously written material — but I feel more confident about completing this particular one because the workload on the individual posts should be relatively low.
Clinton heard of his appeal, but gently rejected Segel, citing she is busy with other things.
The same situation extends across the Western World. In fact European nations, such as Sweden, which have smaller native populations may well become majority non-white before we do. Even in the larger countries the problems associated with mass immigration are becoming obvious, however, their leaders do not see the solution to the problem as stopping immigration, but rather by getting rid of a homogeneous native population. This was made clear by French President Nicolas Sarkozy when he said "the only way to stop the violence and hatred of a multicultural society is through inter breeding between the races", what else was he calling for other than the irradication of the original French people?
Devier “Won’t Mozy to the Endzone” Posey has a bunch of potential and will slide down draft boards. Posey has size and downfield playmaking ability. He played in 12 of Ohio State’s 13 games as a true freshman, catching 11 passes for 117 yards before becoming the Buckeyes’ leading receiver as a sophomore (60-828-8). He finished second to senior Dane Sanzenbacher in 2010 (53-848-7), but still earned honorable-mention All-Big 10 mention from league coaches. Because of his disciplinary issues and a strong WR class, there is no reason Posey will go before the 4th round. A more likley landing spot in the 5th or 6th round. Posey has a lot of potential, if he could get his head on straight.
Robert Rauschenberg
”Most people now believe you have to be very careful with groins,” said Dr. James R. Houston, director of the Army Corps of Engineers Coastal Engineering Research Center in Vicksburg, Miss. ”They usually cause problems.”
Unless someone is comfortable carving the turkey at the table, it is OK to carve the bird in the kitchen before it is placed on the table. Everyone can still come watch if they like. That beautiful bird right out of the oven seems to make everyone salivate and ooooh and aaahh. Difficulties carving the bird are more obvious and awkward at a formal table setting because all eyes are on you. In the kitchen, it just seems more casual and fun. Now if carving at the table is a tradition and works for you, then keep it up.
Before I go further I should mention that I’m well aware that coming out is most definitely one of the most emotionally charged and often traumatic events in a gay person’s life and thus it’s perfect to base a story around. Bigotry is another huge issue and one that we still have to deal with on a day-to-day level. Both of these things (both separately and together) have your conflict and your emotional investment all wrapped up, not to mention that discussing these things through fiction is one of the ways we, as humans, learn to cope with and understand them.
Mrs Alta Klein rudely forced to strip at Johannesburg International Airport
***WARNING!!! Before even thinking about proceeding below, please know that this post is not for the faint of heart. If you do not like spoilers, please leave immediately and go elsewhere on this domain. But if you do like spoilers, then grab some popcorn, sit back, and enjoy. This post has been marked with a Spoiler Alert Seal. Cautiously proceed at your own risk…
An entire Paris trip should not be spent shopping (there is so much to do and see), but a trip to the Alaïa boutique is essential. On my last trip to Paris I picked up a few pieces including this skirt. Alaïa's boutique, stock shop, design studio and atelier are all housed in close proximity to each other. Naturally, upon descending from a taxi (accidentally leaving the door ajar), I sprinted ahead of the gentleman who wasn't exactly sure which building I rushed into. Oh the excitement!
Summer is whizzing by, it shall be August in a few days. I was sorting some garden pics last night. When I saw the lilac pictures, I was struck by how having all the lilac bushes in bloom seemed such a long time ago...I would like to hit some sort of summer pause button!
Unigwe's prose is clear and calm - although some terrible things take place in the book, the reader doesn't feel weighed down by it. Unigwe is also skilled at introducing into the narrative issues that are typical to Nigerian society like polygamy,sexism, belief in superstitions, tribal divisions and so on, using just a single reference or a passing comment, leaving the reader with a fleeting but precious sort of cultural snapshot.
Molly - I have my own Japanese clips! These are on the cloche (more on that tomorrow) in place of the clips in this post.
I'm trying not to feel guilty about having such wonderful writers in my corner. Because I have worked hard to make it so. :)
Some Western companies have been lured (or pushed) a bit too easily in "sharing" their intellectual property without rock-hard agreements that guarantee that the Western company is getting the intellectual property back once the joint venture dissolves. In other words, your joint venture partner can be a significant intellectual property challenge too. Also each company has to think carefully about how much of its knowledge it is willing to transfer in order to get market access. To sum up: Each potential Western company has to ask itself this question: Am I educating a future competitor or building a long-term partnership? Although Mr Davies is not asking the question, he is answering them: "Trust is vital." Read his article here.
Who the fuck are One Direction, and why the fuck are they so popular? The boys from One Direction are in Australia at the moment, playing a few gigs, and the television coverage of them has been non-stop. Teenage girls are losing their shit all over the news. I’m only 26 years old, but fuck, does this shit make me feel old. I could understand if they were this huge group with a string of hits, but I swear I’ve only heard two songs from them, which admittedly aren’t bad, but aren’t earth-shattering either, by any stretch of the imagination.
What do you mean by the EDL’s ‘borderline terrorism’? Or is that just a Leftist soundbite which sounds good but is pretty empty on analysis?
At 18.
My body remembered the familiar course
Or are there shades of gray when dating?
Elays speaks some words which are remarkably clear, such as: yes, sword, punch, signing time, watch, Shelby, daddy, mommy, please, no thank you, Abigail, apple, banana, have it, buckle me. And the one I wish he'd never learned: gimme.
Ludwig Bemelmans's The Best of Times is a compilation of his articles for Holiday magazine recounting his travels through Europe following World War II. Mr. Bemelmans took his title from Dickens, and, indeed, it is not always a rosy view. But to me it said, "Go. Don't wait. You never know."
I had a fun little design challenge presented to me the other day from a reader named Chrissy. She and her hubby just settled into a cute ranch style home in central Illinois with some fixer-upper potential. One of the rooms they plan to renovate is their blue AND pink tile bathroom...
As it is impossible to find himself in the hall without passing the longest red carpet ever seen in any event in recent times, the actor shunned the event.
Really, cold weather? This is how you greet me for the fall/winter running season. No gradual cooling? No easing into it? Just one day and boom, 42 degrees when I step out this morning for my run, huh? Fine.
Nowhere to go, Ted replied, “Yeah, well, times have changed, man.”
The past few days though her and Allie have had a horrible cold resulting in needing the nose blown about every five minutes. Instead of having to walk the 10 extra steps into the bedroom each time to retrieve a kleenex I decided to keep them up high on the couch. I was in the other room helping Allie go potty when I came back in I found this...
Whenever we seek to plan ways of ministry that depend on our ability to manipulate and plan outcome, this is not faith. The ministry that comes from this will be minuscule. Faith that bears fruit is faith that is born from experience with a living God. It is faith that says, “I don’t know where the next check is coming from. All I know is that God told me to do this and trust Him for the next step.” That is faith that moves mountains and moves God’s heart. God rarely allows His servant to see beyond the next faith step. However, those who are willing to take the first step and leave the outcome to Him see His works.
SV: It obviously means a lot for all the guys, the people working for Ferrari who are the sons or daughters of the guys that were here 60 years ago. They are working in the factory, with the same mentality, with the same passion for racing that is in Ferrari’s DNA – of all the workers there. For me, as I said to the team on the radio, I feel very proud of them, of this recovery, always fighting to win races. In spite of a difficult start to the year, (they) never give up, they keep working, they keep showing the Ferrari brand and the Italian flag on the rear wing everywhere we go, very proudly. So, for me, it’s special to race for this team and to give them the maximum capacity and my maximum abilities to give them a good result. This is teamwork and I’m very happy for them.
The spiritual hypothesis that was put forward thousands of years ago has three parts:
The gallery wall behind the tv isn't finished (and after looking at this photo, apparently I don't know how to level), but still, it's much better than nothing on the wall. The tv blends in really well. I'd love to paint that wall a dark grey, but we're not allowed to paint in this place.
Okay so diagnosis on the car is the Starter Motor is dead, so they had to tow it to a workshop to replace it, while there the arm to the suspension is loose that’s why it makes a strange sound when I turn the steering wheel to far (not because I can’t turn it any further) So car should be returned tonight and the bank shall be emptied out a fair bit!
Can there be too much of a good thing?
Oh Yeah. Just what the name implies. Now, now, before you go getting all “I don’t like raw carrots” on me – give me a chance to brag a bit! So, a few friends and I took a raw foods class at the local whole food store (not Whole Foods, but a smaller mom and pop type of store) and we didn’t walk in with high expectations. The crowd looked a bit TOO ‘crunchy’, and the teacher well…. She’s a little eccentric. I’m so glad we went! This is hands down, the BEST carrot dish I have ever had. I’m totally addicted to it. Lunch, snack, side dish with dinner, totally versatile, and uber tasty. Plus its super cheap and super easy. Just try it!
To assemble:
Let me start with a little pic spam (L) I suck at taking pictures.
Row 19: Knit
RB: Bacary Sagna (Arsenal) – Sagna’s selection is somewhat similar to Terry’s selection (explained below), in that he has shown to be the league’s most valuable right back by his absence. Arsenal’s defense is noticeably more solid with Sagna in the lineup than without. In an admittedly weak class of Premier League right backs, Sagna, to me, was the best in 2011/12.
It's just beautiful!
Conor is 15 years old and looks the part of a boy becoming a man. He’s nearly six-feet tall and growing sideburns. His blue eyes are staring out of the coffee shop’s window, where he’s watching a raging snowstorm blanket the downtown streets.
The twins turned 3 months old on 12/13/11. Yes, I am a little late. Not sure how that happened...oh wait. yes I do. It's called going back to work and Christmas craziness. I have not had time to set down to blog. We have been super Snyder busy as usual but I did take their pictures on their 3 month birthday and even remembered to call my dad that day since it was also his birthday, but blogging about it just did not happen until now.
For those who know my back story (feel free to read here for the sordid details), perhaps you can understand why I wanted to hurl a brick at Jason. The story of two loves, one not exactly right, the haunting memory of that perfect old love, rekindling with an ex — it hit too close to home. Like a ton of bricks.
made. Thank you.
hold together the stone walls and floors.
Acts 1:15
these louis-style chairs were given a light distressed look to go with their new upholstery job
While the earth and the heavens were waiting
It also seemed like it it would be fun to offer you, a reader who comments on this blog, a free book. Which I'm doing. Just comment below, include your email, and I'll pick somebody. (The book will come from the publisher.) Or how about a chance to win a zero-gravity flight for participating in the publicist's Change The Conversation contest (click here).
Worth is most beautiful
The Biker is descended from original (white) settlers here in Subdued Excitement. If there is a street out hyar that was named prior to 1900, chances are that it's named after the pioneer family homestead it lead to, and that the Biker clan is related to that family. They liked their strange, those Bikers. Which is a good thing, particularly when you consider the whole 'rural and isolated' part of the equation. This is a part of the country where memories are long and people stay put generation after generation. Long-time residents hear a last name and go 'Oh. You're a 'Fill In the Name,' huh?' after which you're either welcomed and accepted, or turned down for a loan, or remanded to sheriffs' custody. If you've ever read 'To Kill a Mockingbird' you know what I mean.
There was a tiny window high up in the side of the mountain. Bethany used it to watch the world.
--The weather ... the Campo Argentine del Polo ... Jilly Cooper.The climate in those months does sound appealing. As for the rest of this paragraph, here is what I think it means:
The train was packed with young families, students, older couples. A young father helped us load in our suitcases, redeeming the entire male population of France. We settled into our assigned seats, a grouping of four. There was only one person opposite us, a large, scowling, gypsy of a woman, who grunted and buried her head in a paperback as we settled in. The club car was right behind us and we could hear the merry voices of the young vacationers. I pulled out my travel Bible. I had promised my aunt I would give her some guidance as to how to navigate the sometimes daunting book before we got to Taize. Although she’d been baptized and confirmed, run a pre-school program at an Episcopal Church, and maintained a childlike faith her whole life, she had never read The Bible or done any sort of Bible study. This was not uncommon for women of her generation, who were merely asked to make sure the family was dressed nicely for church and didn’t do anything scandalous.
"Nor do I. Every Sherim is different." A reminder he didn't need, but at least Taslin didn't sound like she was instructing a child. If Dora had been herself, Rel knew she'd be lecturing fit to irk the pride of a mountain. The Gift-Giver finished, "Just keep a tight grip on your thoughts. If your attention wanders and you start applying First-Realm logic to anything, blink right away. That should keep you safe."
Who read them? Who looked forward to them? Even the most entertainment-starved, bored persons might impatiently scan them, attempt to get absorbed in them, and give up around the fourth paragraph.
We never discussed politics,
Eighteen months ago, Nora James watched as her father was shot in an alley-and then she fl ed. She changed her name, her appearance and her job, hoping to keep her father’s shooter at bay. For months, it worked…but now her luck has run out. A ruthless assassin is on her trail, and soon Nora, now known as Danielle, will be found. But this time, she has FBI agent Nate Andersen by her side-right? The handsome agent would give his life to protect Danielle, but he’s wary of giving his heart…until a deadly confrontation leaves him with both on the line.
The eyelashes, I’m not sure what to think about it. The only time I ever really wore fake lashes was when I used to do modeling stuff and even then I rarely wore them. There’s just something about the car scene, models and lashes that I just don’t get and probably never will, I prefer real lashes or at least more natural looking ones. These ones seemed really long and thick; I know if I ever do use them, I’ll have to cut them to size and probably get some Duo glue. But like I said, it’ll be a special occasion, like a girls’ night out, bachelorette party, Halloween or something ridiculous.
there is watching but here goes...."
they like -- we talked about how songs can be about love, about a favorite
Since July 1, 2011, over 19,000 patient records have been entered the Heart Failure, Stroke and Resuscitation Patient Management Tools in the state of North Carolina. In 2011, there were 23 Joint Commission Certified Primary Stroke Centers in North Carolina.
2. My mother taught me: RELIGION.
There's no better friend than a sister,
He's loved getting to spend lots of time with family,
Here're some photos The EGE took when we visited in 2010. Their front lawn was so amazingly green:
-our homeschool group has been growing like gangbusters and keeping me very busy.
I went once to Växjö Kendo Dojo, for the first time in my life, and i really enjoy just watching they practice. I didn’t have the chance to practice cuz all study and commute by train and bus to Växjö.
Now, don't get me wrong I love a good story about the creepiness of religion and priests going all badass on Satan himself. But at the same time I feel with the constant release of these movies I get increasingly more immune to the body cracking and the constant big bad voice coming out of creepy young girls. It just doesn't do it for me, unless we're talking strictly about the classic The Exorcist, which it's behind the scenes story is even creepier then the film itself.
Last Sunday, I had a wild encounter with two chameleons. Last Tuesday, it was a wild encounter with monkeys at Pulau Ubin. They can be found in the protected pockets of the rainforests here. They were not afraid of people. One bold fellow came down from the trees and jumped to one of the bicycles parked here.
Anyway, this music was used quite substantially in Carl Sagan’s Cosmos, the documentary I wrote about a few weeks ago. I didn’t know what it was called for quite some time and Ignacio wasn’t an easy album to find at the time. Now you can easily order it from the internet.
the past few weeks have been incredibly busy and it's been been wonderful! I have been working with new tools and supplies and will be posting new projects very soon. lots of changes going on in my studio and I am so excited! more on that later...
The stately noble lion is a direct heir to the throne
15. Ju Ju Man
Copic Markers:
We have never disputed the connection between classical conservatism (a la Edmund Burke), and the construct of SDO. We have merely tried to distill the hierarchy-enhancing aspects of this old ideology from many other components of "conservatism" which have no central or necessary connection with the disposition of societies to create and maintain group-based social hierarchies (e.g., traditionalism, religiosity, sexual restraint, belief in free-markets, devotion to freedom, etc.).
What Parker says happened next could make the fallout from the brutal beating even worse. As the attackers walked away, leaving Owen bleeding on the ground, Parker says one of them said "Now thats justice for Trayvon." Trayvon Martin is the unarmed teenager police say was shot and killed February 26 by neighborhood watch captain George Zimmerman in Samford, Florida. Police canvassed the area, but did not find any suspects. They're asking anyone with information to call them at 251-208-7211, Crime Stoppers at 251-208-7000, or text a tip to 274637 and include the keyword CRIME 411. WKRG's website also quotes a neighbor who said earlier today they also heard the words "Now that's justice for Trayvon" after the beating of Owens.
this life is defeating me. i’m looking at the calender and wondering if i will have the balls to either make it to that day in october, or if i’ll have the balls to open my head on the sidewalk below that bridge over that highway lane – and that bridge just looks like a great place to jump if that is how i ultimately choose to do it. i love the fact that i have choices.
When CPR is performed right away the chances of surviving a cardiac arrest are almost four times greater.
There’s no hot water
My first exposure to the Arabic language came when I met my future husband back in 1977. We were college students and I had never really been around Arabs before. Adnan and his other Arab friends would hang out, socialize, and share meals together, and of course, speak in Arabic. I used to sit back and listen to these men conversing in this alien language, with its strange guttural sounds. One surprising thing that I eventually got used to was hearing the use of the “F” word sprinkled amidst the Arabic words. The inappropriate English word actually forms the ending sound for many normal Arabic words. I would wonder how this fascinating language could often sound so harsh, crude and abrasive, yet always appear so beautifully artistic when written out in script.
So, can’t believe it is April 4. It actually is my Mom’s Birthday today! Happy Birthday, Mom!
Awesome book #2: ANGELFIRE by Courtney Allison Moulton. It was really cool to read this book in ARC form. And Will easily joins my list of absolute favorite love interests. (And this is not a long list!)
For we can not all be shepherds,
May 18
Until he shall have driven her back to Hell,
The winner of our birthday challenge has been chosen by Random.Org and is No. 54, Dee's Designs Blog. Congratulations Dee. Please contact us (email in the sidebar) so we can arrange for you to receive your prize.
The Lifeguard is after all looking out for me.
over the last few decades suggests we may soon see an ice-free Arctic summer. But then, as I have linked many times before, the US Navy has long known this and is making major plans. So are the Russians. Maybe THAT will get through to your crazy uncle.
to mock our squeamishness;
Quality: Good
This is the famous variety selected by Mr Golding of East Malling from a garden of Canterbury Whitebines shortly before 1790 (2).
I used the easel card fold again to finish my card. I just love how easy this is and yet makes such a special finish to any card, making it ready to display right out of the envelope! I've used his card a lot and shared it already a few times with you but this time I'm going to tell you how to make an easel card of your own.
He also draws my attention to the idea of exposing and ‘making visible, in social research as doomed to failure. Making the lives experience transparent, relies on excluding certain features. Savage is drawn to the work of Timothy Mitchell which is concerned with ‘locationless logic’. He also refers to Carolyn Steedman and her work on social identity which I have explored briefly. Steedman’s research on autobiography as a process introduced in UK education has relevance when exploring the narratives cultural entrepreneurs construct when being interviewed.
Rationally, I am aware that my reaction is extreme and that his comment was not aimed at me and was a common misconception of what schizophrenia actually is, however my feelings towards him and the band that have literally saved my life on several occasions just isn’t the same. They are no longer my allies, my voice when I am voiceless. They are the enemy and must be kept away from me at all costs because of how badly they hurt me.
We did a couple years ago but had to miss out last year.
After nearly 10 years here in the country I love, I am inclined to drop acquaintances and just let them get on with their own devices and live my life without them. When I come to think of it, there were very few people in the UK that I would count as ‘good’ reliable friends, I should follow my instincts as I did then.
Meanwhile, ObamaCare has step-by-step been entrenching itself within healthcare and its organizations. Early victims are health insurance agents and those many who rely upon them. I’ve yet to find a major blog that has written about this. Their comp is being cut by up to 50%, with more cuts to come, and many are leaving the business and those who need them with lessened defense against ObamaCare or giant insurance companies most interested in profiting from ObamaCare. I wrote about this here, In Defense Of Health Insurance Agents, And You, and here, CBO: ObamaCare Within 5% Of Nationalizing Insurance Companies, and here, Are Health Insurance Agents Worth It: The Canaries In ObamaCare Mine.
“You are also now using a fallacy known as ad hominem…” You don’t seem to realise the difference between an ad hominem and an insult. I was merely insulting you. Ad hominem fallacies are not about attacking a person’s character INSTEAD of their arguments, they are about attacking a person’s character, therefore they are wrong. If you are going to call someone out on a logical fallacy, please understand what they actually are before you do, because it makes you look rather stupid.
and he was heard because of his reverent submission.”
Seed sales are driven by commodity cycles and price expectations. Monsanto numbers are scrutinized closely. So its interesting to read this snippet attributable to Hugh Grant, chairman, president and chief executive officer for Monsanto. “We are pleased growers have recognized the value of our products and the benefits they provide on farm. Our pipeline progress continues to be a competitive differentiator, and that’s ever more important as we put an even greater focus on delivering yield to growers.”
The old township of Benwell, in Northumberland until 1904, included the village of Scotswood in the south west corner where it bordered with East Denton. The name Scotswood probably dates from 1367 when Richard, son of John Scott, obtained permission to enclose the west ward in Benwell which belonged to him.
Moose puckey.
i know i’ve done quite a lot of whinging already, but i must add that this item was a real bother to block, given its shape. now that i look at the photos, i can see that a few hundred more pins and even more attention to setting the details perfectly would have made the more intricate sections a little more noticeable (and really, what is the point of labouring over work like row 38 if you don’t showcase it properly? silly me). one bright note, however, is that the pain of blocking was partially alleviated by the glorious scent left by the flora soak i used when bathing my pre-blocked tango. flora soak is a product so deliciously soft and floral that i’m seriously considering using it in the shower.
They took some honey, and plenty of money
So, as a newbie to this accessible van world - what do you do when there is no handicapped parking? Or regular parking? Or valet?
Wouldn’t an ordinary life be better? I had to study foreign languages since I was a prince. Maybe I could talk my dad out of studying languages. It was worth a try. I could use a translator, after all, could I not? It was certainly worth a try. Anything to get out of this tedious language study.
16. City of Fayetteville Guidelines for a Façade Grant
*Spotted on the Folly Theater's calendar: Join with a group of stellar Kansas City musicians as we depart on a narrated journey of musical “time travel.” Starting in the early 1900s, we explore how America’s “melting pot” of many cultures provided the ingredients for the development and evolution of our country’s original the true meaning of our country's original musical art form – Jazz! This Folly Theater Production is high energy, great toe-tappin’ fun! The event is April 4, 2013.
One of my biggest worries when I started my degree was whether I had left it too late to become a solicitor. I will be 36 when I finish, and 37 when I’ve done either of the vocational qualifications. Would I be too long in the tooth for someone to take on? Would I be doing an expensive degree only to find out the market had no use for me? In the end, I decided that this was something I’do always wanted to do, and even if it didn’t lead to anything, a good quality degree never hurts. Besides, I was doing this to prove to myself that I could. So I got on with it.
Men, my new book MAN ALIVE comes out on January 17. I would like to enlist your help to get the word out.
As a result, we are depriving ourselves of the staggering gift that we have been given: life itself, and accepting a hollow substitute in its place.
Throw everything in whatever catch-all place you have in your home.
A genuine smile broke across Addison’s reserved face. “My felicitations, sir. To you both.”
Let's recap my goals:
1289 ***D-I/25/1998. “Beginnings: On Hesiod’s Theogony.” Works of the Mind Lecture Series, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1998(13), above, pp. 141-49, in Item C-1998(12), above, pp. 789-99, and in Item B-12, above, pp. 261-70 (2002).)
Despite the numbers who have held the island to ransom for the day, there remains a tangible air of calm. The sea breeze hits my face with the same refreshing effect of an early morning shower. Senses are awakened and I feel a surge of anticipation, as the history of this tiny island speaks into my present. To meander slowly is a rare luxury. We pass Celtic crosses on the road and I have time to consider another road leading to a cross.
Clown fish
I immediately went to the "Cocktails" tab and started looking through the recipes for alcoholic drinks. Dealing with customers every day has turned me into quite the alcohol connoisseur. They have a recipe called a Peanut Brittle Caramella that looks good but I didn't get that flavor of syrup in the package so I couldn't make it. Not until I buy the right syrup for it. Hmm...clever marketing tactic, Torani.
Paley Festival panel featurette
Keep smiling…
Thankfully, my now former workplace was supportive in this endeavor, one of the senior HR guys pulled strings to get my the final weeks of my notice free so I could attend these conferences and on my final day the CE pulled me into his office and gave me what I took to be a very heartfelt pep talk (the kind that no one had ever given me before). Besides the official and infrastructural support, former colleagues and now friends were all very affirming of my moves and I was given opportunities to talk through my research and have challenges presented by Maori tribal elders (in our parlance known as kaumatua and kuia) which gave me opportunities to refine my approach and the further ability to articulate what the hell it was I was actually doing.
Daughter decided that this morning was not going to be a lie in past 8am kind of day so we were up and breakfasted by 8.30hrs, then we decided despite the outside blue skies and sunshine it was actually cold in the house, switching the heating on for a half hour would get us woke up and ready to commit to the outside sunshine we hoped, well that was after I had a mad idea to make some chocolate cakes, of which daughter assisted.
Most Popular Comments
Here's another glamorous typeface. A designer called Moshik Nadav was so inspired by the world of fashion that he decided to create his own 'Paris' typeface, which is now being picked up by fashion magazines and luxury brands. The typeface is a cheeky, chic mix of beautiful ligatures and sexy numerals. You never hear those two words together – "sexy numerals" – do you? Well, it's about time we did! Personally, I'm rather fond of a sexy numeral, especially if it has more than seven 0s on the end...
Tony.
13. “The Lord strengtheneth all that are falling” (ver. 14). But who are “all that are falling”? All indeed fall in a general sense, but he meaneth those who fall in a particular way. For many fall froth Him, many also fall from their own imaginations. If they had evil imaginations, they fall from them, and “God strengthened all that are falling.” They who lose anything in this world, yet are holy, are as it were dishonoured in this world, from rich become poor, from honoured of low estate, yet are they God’s saints; they are, as it were, falling. But “God strengtheneth.” For “the just falleth seven times, and riseth again; but the wicked shall be weakened in evils.” When evils befall the wicked, they are weakened thereby; when evils befall the righteous, “the Lord strengtheneth all that are falling.” …”And lifteth up all those that have been cast down:” all, that is, who belong to him; for “God resisteth the proud.”
Lisa, with her sweet lips pursed to an unnecessary level of cuteness actually squeaked when her main course arrived. I was quite surprised; I hadn’t heard her order blue steak and lobster tails. She giggled - a rapacious child - cutlery in her hands ready and waiting to attack. I watched her face, studying the pale, steely grey eyes that darkened to reflect the carnage as she ripped into the meat. Taking the first bite she looked up at all of us, her smile savage. The flesh on Lisa’s plate had been flash-griddled – a minute at most on either side. She poured a Roquefort sauce onto a dark-leafed salad and watched the blood streak curling patterns into the pale yellow cream. Spittle glistened at the corner of her lips as she anticipated the next mouthful. I don’t eat red meat, but by God I
It’s time for all conservatives to step up and support our nominee. It’s your country and it’s up to every single one of you to fight for her survival as a free republic.
Whilst the French (and in fact most of the advanced democratic nations) have recognised that a citizen is a citizen no matter where they live, the authorities in our country continue to ignore the rights of overseas Malaysians. Not all Malaysians are equal.
Is worth it too.
I also remember watching a british cartoon called Count Duckula which I would always be laughing at as a child. I love the fact that Sir David Jason was one of the voice overs, he ‘voiced’ the character very well and brought the character to life. This program was not as popular it seems as I remember not many children talking about the cartoons at school or when out playing.
tapping the keys
Without futher ado then, here is a visual retrospective and representative sampling of the items and descriptions appearing in The Arduin Adventure.
But that is okay, mostly because I have always believed that desiring and attaining more knowledge is the key to health, happiness and life. Though sometimes what we are learning about, hopefully teaches us to quickly and eventually find the flip-side of what is our current experience. All of this bringing me around to what I have figured out for me, as I allowed the sudden breaking up of the audio book I got for my birthday, hence suggesting to me I had learned enough, back off, allow this to sift, and let the globs of discomfort, and the aching Knee-d (need) in my leg to be felt/heard.
I move things around alot in our house, i like to switch things up... but now i don't know what to do with this wall..
A decision that many of us have had to make in our lives.
I still consider myself a beginner and am happy to stick with extract with steeped grains for a bit until I get my skills better refined, so I decided to take a look at all of the “beginner” recipes.
Why is the camera pointed mainly at Sam?
Anyway, do download this album, it's a real peach. If this is goodbye, thanks to the small group of you who have been loyal and vocal supporters. Maybe I'll get my energy back and keep fighting the good/bad music fight, we'll see. The wordpress version of this blog feels like a sham, though.
I've taken my flak of unfair criticism here on the site, that I am a supporter or advocate of self-publishing. Anyone who has cared to peruse these pages or who have been clients of mine know that is not the case. I made the argument of where I stand on self-publishing and the publishing industry in my article Publishing: Advocate or Be Damned. I'll not repeat it here. I'm happy simply to say that no matter what I or others say about the complexity and difficulties that face self-published authors, more now than ever, that authors are still going to decide to self-publish. I'd just like to give them the best possible chance they can of success; by thoroughly reviewing print and publishing services and shining a light on the publishing industry as it develops and changes.
The eleventh chakra is held by the crystal charoite and this is the chakra that motivates you to persevere so that you can master yourself. So that you can graduate from the university of life with distinctions. When you are working with the eleventh strand you are actively searching for your divine purpose. You are adamant to find out why you are here and this automatically sets in motion a chain reaction of experiences that will show you what is no longer supporting you and what is. And in a way it offers you the same challenge as the ninth strand – do you want it or don’t you – are you going to change or are you going to remain in your comfort zone. In order to master yourself you need to be courageous enough to admit to and acknowledge what is no longer a part of you, what no longer serves you and what you are afraid of.
In translational studies, both patients with PBC and NOD.c3c4 mice demonstrate significant improvement in biliary disease with combination antiviral therapy. An overview of the biological relevance of the beta retrovirus infection in PBC will be discussed in this review.
With that, Hannah bowed her little head, folded her hands and followed with "Dear Lord, please protect Emily today. Stay with her God and help Mommy and I not to be sad when we miss her. Amen."
Brick and mortar, usually, although Amazon is best for presents and for elusive stuff. It’s also excellent for cheapo second-hand stuff. But I much prefer actual real-life bookshops, because you can touch the books and have a flick through. You can’t browse in the same way on Amazon.
We made it to our first night in our own home at 1:00 am and proceeded to sleep 3 hours. Which made our grand total of sleep about 3 hours 25 minutes in three days.
Around that time previous BNP leader John Tyndall was suspcious of Griffin:
"His humility" and "his decency" are two things, so they "reflect," not "reflects."
2. In a large bowl, whisk together the fish sauce, vegetable oil, water, baking powder, tapioca starch, sugar, pepper, cinnamon, shallot and garlic. When marinade is evenly combined, add the prepared pieces of pork, stirring to coat thoroughly. Cling wrap the bowl and set aside in the refrigerator for at least 8 hours and up to 24 hours. The pieces of pork will become considerably stiffer.
I'm not sure when the first instance of "airbrushing" first appeared on a baseball card.
This comes with a Pie Warning.
silvery spring mist
I had the chance to run a project specifically for April Fool’s Day this year but declined because I was concerned that it would only result in one day of coverage - but should I have considered that the opportunity for a big PR hit that could go viral could outweigh the advantage of a longer lasting news story? I think so. Maybe next year…
“This is a difficult time for Rangers and I hope my departure will help others keep their jobs. The most important thing in this whole saga is the Club’s future is secured and Rangers looks forward to better days. I am sure that will happen and my support will always be there for the Club.”
I am so impressed by all of the beautiful doily designs the Silhouette Plus members have made. It was so flattering to get all of the positive feedback on the Doily Designing In Studio video tutorial I made to inspire "Silhouetters" to get in there, design, play and have fun.
Her father stood there like a stone. Perhaps he was still confused.
Stay tuned . . . .
I know I’ve mentioned my therapist is currently on personal leave outside the United States… we’re talking third world county, 9,600 feet above sea-level leave, without civilization. I feel really bad, my timing couldn’t have been worse, what am I talking about it, it wasn’t my timing, it was my father’s. That’s not my fault, but still. I feel shitty for the timing. Regardless of the timing issue, she made herself available to touch base with me post meeting with the Victim’s Rights Attorney. You will find no conversation more honest than the conversations I have with her. I am more than grateful for her time and the strength I have walked away with.
2 Id., 62-65, exclusive of annexes.
There is more to being free….I must be strong.. I have to learn to fly….I must have faith…and sometimes I will cry….
THE SPA
Assuming for the moment that what we have stated thus far is understandable enough, let us consider how messages are transmitted by the Messenger Angel(s) to human beings. We begin by discussing those that have to do with individual humans.
Inspiration on how I live my life come from my children, who inspire me to see things from a different perspective, to let go of all the crap that can get pent up, to find humor in almost anything and to not take myself so seriously, and my husband, who inspires me to be the best me I can be. I’m also blessed to have a very close-knit family and circle of friends who support me and who I can draw inspiration from. I hope that I do the same for them.
Do you do a ## before ## goal list each year? I'd love to see them! Link me over!
His beautiful chariot, beneath a lion-flag and yoked to brilliantly black horses set out from the city along with soldiers, horsemen, elephanteers and charioteers.
US forces are called in to repress the rebellion in March of 1919. For the first time ever, airplanes are used to support soldiers. The fighting continues until November 1920. The official US record of casualties shows that thirteen US soldiers and 3,071 Haitians are killed.
There are some days where I need a nap by 8am. It may have been a bad morning or I spilled my coffee all down my blouse.
The first step after training is finding a digsite to go to. Go to your world map and look at the continents. Across the various zones, you’ll see little shovels which correspond to the dig sites that you can go to – up to four per continent, randomly generated. If you zoom in to the zone map you’ll then see a blob across an area, which is the boundaries of where you can do your surveying to find your precious artifacts. Hop on a flight path and head towards where you want to start.
You say eether and I say eyether,
I absolutely LOVE that gorgeous button bow and the scallop square and bling ring - simply gorgeous! Congrats Erica! Please stop on by Erica's blog, Pink Buckaroo Designs for more of her beautiful work.
Beer and Food matching evening with Melissa Cole. I've never been, done, or even thought about one of these before. But the function room has been booked, and now the beer list is nearly complete we should soon have an idea which foods are being matched. I'm extremely nervous about this because until we find a chef who doesn't need accommodation I'm running the kitchen alongside the bar and now festival. I have a feeling Saturday night I'll be in 3 or 4 different places at once.
I get sick. So viciously sick that I am unable to stand up in our two room schoolhouse, preferring to sit on the stone floor. I sweat, and sweat, and sleep. High doses of amoxicillin start to battle back whatever has taken over my system and I prop myself up to play Barbies with two of the girls at home. My señora takes care of me, going to the store for crackers and Gatorade. I miss out on a special dinner served on Fridays during Lent, and watch a religious procession from a chair in the living room. By 3 a.m. on Sunday, I am fumbling with the lock on the door, letting go of the gigantic iron hook with a BOOM, bringing my señora and her sister to the door. They send me off with sleepy blessings and good wishes, and I go through the motions of getting back to Illinois.
Dan and the friendly man began to discuss in excited tones what had just happened. The guy explained that he’d been heading to the storage shed just down the road. Apparently he helped maintain the golf course as well. I just sat there, crying. Thoughts of what could’ve happened to us kept flashing through my mind. That moose had been close to us. He’d been gaining. We wouldn’t have beaten him to our house. I had almost just died, or at least been injured by a moose. What if the car hadn’t been driving past? What if it had been just me out there and I hadn’t even noticed the moose until too late? Why did it chase us? It had happened so quickly, all in less time than it takes to tell.
More Pepsi machines.
So here's the menu of the dessert table:
A citizen had reported to police that he was carrying a gun. As a result, police officers took precautions with students who were in DDHS physical education classes that were outside on the DDHS campus at the time.
So we have a bit of a David and Goliath situation. Our MP, Ian Liddell-Grainger, isn't being exactly supportive so far. Which is also interesting because it's his party which has advocated the 'Big Society' and this, surely, is localism in action, rather than just rhetoric.
1776.
Here's another thing I found a bit odd about the broom, those 2 parts that hang out like they do, I think they kind of stand out and don't really blend well with the rest of the broom's end, but again, not a big deal.
(Hint: hypothetical = totally, absolutely happened in real life, so get ready for sparks to start flying)
Apply that concept to the pervasive binaries that run through contemporary thinking about the future and some of the strategy that’s guided this blog since its inception may be a little more clear to my regular readers. When The Archdruid Report was launched five and a half years ago, the most common of those binaries was the insistence that the future of industrial society had to be either an endless trajectory of continued progress, on the one hand, or a sudden cataclysmic dieoff on the other. The experiment of consistently proposing a more plausible third option—the option of decline, which after all is what’s happened to every past civilization that’s overshot its resource base, as ours has—seems to have played some role in helping the peak oil scene get past that fixation.
And this is one of those great craigslist stories where its even better in person... The color was off in the pics on the ad, but when I got there my dreams were confirmed -it was that sick sweet soft mint green in pristine condition! Plus, it came with a faucet that wasn't mentioned in the ad! The faucet's a repro, but still good.
Perhaps the 21st century will not be all biology.
Speaking from the point of view of a unschooled child (rather than an unschooling parent), I would say that the experience of unschooling helped me to remain confident in myself: confident that I had the ability to learn new ideas and skills when I need them, confident I could find meaningful ways to occupy myself without a strict schedule, confident that I could navigate the world and find help when I needed it from people with particular expertise, or whom I had caring relationships with.
Then I scored a part in Androcles and the Lion. I played a woman who comes across a lion while wandering in the forest. My role included running away and fainting on stage. It sounded simple enough, but to my surprise, I needed to learn to fall down. It's not a matter of just falling. I needed to make sure I didn't injure myself.
I am trying to imagine how anyone makes money that isn't somehow, directly or indirectly, made possible by consumers like us going out and buying stuff.
The course helped me focus on what I wanted to write, and gave me ideas about how. It challenged me to have a go at all sorts of writing, and it gave me a chance to relax and have fun with writing stories as well.
Then you have it .... a little difficult to move into place given the honeycomb construction, but with my aid and a towel to slide on we made it. Then the fun began ... the race was on to sort prior to the pumpkins return home from school. Because as we all know assistance from the pumpkins adds, ohhh lets say another hour to the operation and loads of aggravation.
"Honestly, if you live in Asia where the filling ingredients are easy to find and buy pre-made, and most of the other ingredients for the skin are also prepared for you, it's not really hard at all. If you live in the West, where the ingredients may be more difficult to find and you'd have to make everything from scratch by yourself, then yes, I'd say it would be tougher."
And O!M!G! he wont stop calling.. now that pissing me off over money or lack of sex or his drinking did not work. .he has decided he is going to give me parenting advice.. ya know.. like when Son spoke to me VERY disrespectfully this weekend.. and he sat there and let him.. for 15 minutes.. and hours later.. when I told him off.. his answer.. his “parenting” was to throw Son’s tv out in the yard.. so YEA!! I need his advice on how to parent these kids..
Dear polenta,
The old verse aptly sums up this sabbat , which is traditionally concerned with sex and fertility magic.
short attention span (unless it's about an obsession)
The shame of it is that anytime over the last 10 years I could have called him and he would have fixed me I'm sure, but sometimes you feel that you can't ask nobody no more for no favor.
“Yep. Except if I don’t eat them, they die.”
My wife likes pineapple chunks for lunch, but I think most of the ones I eat are in Thai entrees. Thailand has been the world's largest producer of pineapples since 1975. I do not know the etymology of สับปะรด sapparot (I can only manage transparent ones and don't have access to an appropriate resource). They are mentioned there by Louis XIV's ambassador Simon de la Loubère, who was also a friend of Leibniz. The same work gave to Europe an Indian method of constructing odd-order magic squares; the rules for Chinese chess; and one of the earliest mentions of and translations from Pali. (The Google Books scan did not manage to get the alphabet table fold-outs; fortunately the Gallica one did.)
I remembered long ago, a friend telling me that her husband and kids refused to eat chicken or fish UNLESS she slathered it with mayo before popping it in the oven. In thinking about what I could do quickly with what I had on hand, this came to mind.
Pendragon: Justice is done. Goodbye, gentlemen.
You know how they say, "Be careful what you ask for!" well, I should have listened because one of the last things I remember saying at lunch to my co-workers was, "I think it's time for 'Johnny' to have a different teacher." See, he was VERY difficult and although I adored him, he drove me nuts. (You know the type, right?) I MEANT that maybe HE should switch classrooms and be in class for the last trimester with one of my fellow 1st grade team members, both of which were willing to take him... WHAT ACTUALLY HAPPENED WAS, I was in a MAJOR car accident on April 7th driving home from work after picking up my two girls. Here is a link where I blogged about the accident on my scrapbooking blog that I had started. So, HE did get a different teacher, he got a long-term sub to finish out the year while I was in the hospital and later home... in a wheelchair.
Most of all, Archie loves us. He especially loves me. And, being an energetic young border collie, he loves to walk.
93. Lay (레이) his full name is Zhang Yi Xing (张 艺 兴).
The following carrier fees apply to your domestic air travel:
From the time I got the idea, filmed it, took the still shots, and edited it all together, - 3 hours.
"VB's Raise a Glass campaign will no doubt find favour with anyone who thinks binge drinking is an appropriate part of remembering Australians who have served in wars, and it will raise plenty of useful funds for Legacy, but that doesn't make it ethical." (Trevor Cooke, Corporate Engagement Blog)
Sooner or later, this:
2. a bine more speckled with red, of less luxuriant growth, on which
They also have a new collection that I came across today at www.lexington.com called Royal Kahala. I see the words "exotic fusion" in the description... sure, I'll take some of that in my house! lol.
Oct 11 - The Kings Arms, Salford, UK
One of the key people responsible for brewing this and the other Boag’s beers is Stephen Jensen a brewing Team Leader and a genuinely nice bloke. (Are there any other kinds of brewers, really?) Stephen happened to be on holiday (many Tasmanians come to Melbourne during winter chasing warmer days – though not many like Stephen who hails originally from Ipswich) and was more than happy to meet and greet the folks at The Plough and to answer their brewing questions.
Fru Ida Juhanantytär
Aage Haugland (Bass)
2. "Bathtubs"
Martin Luther wrote the 95 thesis which stated reasons what he thought was wrong with the Roman Catholic Church. He hoped to start a discussion on whether or not the teachings of the Church were correct. He nailed these writings on the door the Castle Church in Wittenberg, and the 95 thesis were also printed on pamphlets and sent across all Germany. The 95 thesis started a discussion across all of northern Europe — the primary spark behind the Protestant Reformation.
“Nora...”
As parents, my husband and I want our kids to be responsible and to fulfill their obligations and to fully experience things by having full or nearly full participation. Sometimes complete participation is just impossible such as when a kid is asked to be in two or three places at the same exact time.
So who are these authors?
The final stand-out aspect of the E-Series 3-Series is a range of new standard features offered on all models HSV, specifically:
A mini report from the Spring Trade Fair in Utrecht last week: We had the same stand, as you can see in the previous post, with the same crew (Snor and Jurianne), but we had it painted in a different colour... You can get a glance of my latest product (the Pop-up Posters) which I will show next week, when I have had time to take some proper photo's!
Soon hork - a fresh water type fish, it only be graded A when it is big enough. We were happy with this steamed Soon Hork as the meat is solid and bouncy, which means the fish was big and fresh enough. The gravy appeared to be plain old soy sauce, it enhanced the freshness of the fish – double thumbs up!
But perhaps a gazpacho is a good thing on a dull day. Reminds you of sunshine and sun and sea. So, gazpacho it was.
I had a self-guided walking tour map, which we followed. I had my map out and a man at a time-share shop offered to give me a better one, although I was using a guide from Frommer’s. We ended up booking a time-share lecture for Tuesday, as we were offered $125 in dining options. I thought it would be nice to have for a splurge dinner.
This is really not a thriller. I'm still not sure what it is, but "legal novel" or "commercial fiction" or maybe even "women's fiction" are more likely than "thriller."
Soulless - Gail Carriger
The nation - or rather the small part of the nation that is remotely interested in our ultimate fate, in what's going to happen to us over the next five years, rather than TV's 'Strictly Come Out of Here' with Anton Dick - waits with bated breath for the release of the Coalition agreement document - the manifesto of the Blue 'n' Yellow party.
I strongly urge you all to vote, if nothing else it will give the MSN another story for the papers. Last time I ran a poll we had 15,000 votes. The votes are restricted by cookie. That’s cookie as in computer, not as in doughnuts. Thank you.
10. Secret Powers - What Every Rose Grower Should Know
I thought about it. I knew it would only take 30 seconds. I'll regret it in a few more hours.
“A Threesome with Kevin Smith” sounds lewd in the context of his new theatrical release but it’s not – for the most part.
What politics in general (and the EU in particular) has lost in the years since Bill Clinton split the hairs between sexual intercourse and eccentric use of cigars is a total loss of trust.
Marriage had been
I can still hear what I thought
Recently, Trey's lease on his car ended and we decided to be a little more thrifty so instead of getting him a new car, he downgraded to my Xterra and I downgraded to one of the summer work vans! Minivans aren't necessarily considered cool, but they're probably even less cool when you don't even have kids to put in them. Here's what I'm cruising in these days...
It’s only for a trial period (at least right now; who knows, long-term?). Six weeks. Forty-two days. Not that I’m counting.
It was the pool's first sighting of the President since they'd joined him at the Presidential Palace in Kabul hours before; they'd spent much of his trip in a hangar at Bagram Air Base, where they watched the President make a live address to America just like everyone else in America: By TV feed.
The approval, long in coming – over 18 months, and aided by a micro-loan through a program backed by Boston Beer Company – seemed a bit anti-climactic, but it was celebratory nonetheless.
4. THE MAN WHO LAUGHS (1928) at the Niles Essanay Silent Film Museum. Again, I could put pretty much everything I saw at Niles on this list, but I had to choose one, and this is it.
'Its easy to love you now, you're young and fun. But pick me, not him, I'll love you when the winds dried you out and you're old and broken.' - Class!
I was tipped off that the following two articles presumably represent duplicate publication. I fully support the allegation that the 2002 article from the Journal of Pathology represents a case of self-plagiarism.
raspberry (yes, all the berry names sound different!)
The many battles that have been fought to keep the original names of cities and towns, has ultimately been a fruitless exercise, as the ANC and their liberal cronies have always been one step ahead, and have crafty managed to advance their agenda of alienation in slow gradual stages, step-by-step… so much so that the country’s maps, online and in print form, have become a scribbled jumble of utter confusion.
2. Next, cut the roll to the desired width that you would like your cuff to be.
The only problem was that after Iran retrieved a downed stealth drone Iran warned the US they cracked their stealth technology and could track stealth bombers on their radar. The arrogant US military officials though it was all just a propaganda stunt. But it wasn’t and as soon as the US launched their stealth bombers to attack, Iran was fully aware the attack was coming in a few hours. It was the beginning of the end… for the United States.
I always babysat, but I got my first 'real' job at 14, the summer before I went into high school. I worked in the gift shop of a local aquarium on the boardwalk.
With their face in the dirt and a raised up butt.
I focus on my home market, which is the UK, but I have an eye on the foreign markets too.
So this whole Kufflefulled segment will be called love fashion...everything I've bought and want. :::
I realised years ago that gamblers must be prepared to lose every dollar that they bet and that you can't win every time you have a bet.
A mask to hide behind to tell the truth… to say this is who is inside me, what I believe, what I want, what I think, how I feel. But look neither upon my face, nor into my eyes… for therein lies my mortal soul, and it would whither should you see it bared before you.
It is an established rule that none of its reports should be tampered with or doctored by channels carrying its News Service and the statement makes plain that this is a potentially deeply serious breach of its contract with Astro:
I have struggled with my weight since having children (18 years ago). This is not because I didn't eat my veges or couldn't lose weight, but that the "bad foods" always took over my willpower; especially when it came to choosing which foods to buy according to our budget (I love a good deal) and portion sizes. As a result, it would take me years to lose weight after having a baby. I also fed my family professed foods, genetically altered foods, fast foods, corn syrup and pesticide infected meats and vegetables that I thought were healthy.
I think we all need to reconsider what we really "need" to live well and happy. Not Huge SUV's, $1000 designer handbags, 4000 sq feet of living space....
The present crisis has seen a lot of debate about mark-to-market accounting. Traders tend to favor mark-to-market, as do academics who mistrust banks' motives and accounting. Bankers and efficient market skeptics argue for more flexibility. The usual problem, of course, is that in a crisis prices can plummet for liquidity reasons, which can cause institutions to become insolvent on a mark-to-market basis, causing bankruptcies, liquidations, further price declines, and more insolvencies. Very few people are comfortable actually allowing this dynamic to play out, but it is a struggle to find a credible alternative accounting regime. For large institutions, like the banks that hold troubled mortgages, there's an even more fundamental problem with mark-t0-market accounting: it is circular and therefore not well-defined.
Leave a comment below!
Perhaps that is why a week of sickness in our home was so utterly painful. I was forced to sit and didn't really want to. I recently found myself sitting in the van with a minute or two to spare. I grabbed a wet wipe to clean my steering wheel and dashboard. When that was done, I collected trash. I realized I could just sit and talk to the kids and enjoy the moment. I did.
me: Trust me, it just has to do with good manners and what’s appropriate for a little boy to say.
1 experimenting
Luckily Lucy still digs me now, pregnant or not, which is pretty nice. Pretty nice indeed.
I worked out why the camera was taking everything in 'soft focus' - the lens was smeared with butter *guilty face*
And truly I was right. My daughter loved the album. Actually the whole family delighted in the album, these pictures of welcoming sweet number three to our family.
Not a bad mix of packs and here are the best of best.
Today we are showcasing 2 more wonderful sets of stamps - Compact Sentiments & Heirloom Patterns
So here is an easy Bottle Trap for Mosquitoes:
books--stephen king is back on track and i loved 11/23/63. i also read the hunger games trio. i will try not to spoil it for those of you who've not read them--but, while many people i talked to where not happy w/ the ending, i was. no, it was not a shiney happy, tied w/ a ribbon ending, but it was the right ending for the story. the movie really disappointed me. i just read jodi picoult's house rules. it's about a single mom w/ two teen sons, one has asperger's. i am curious as to whether her portrayal of a person w/ asperger's is correct. it was very moving and really opened my eyes to what parents of children w/ autism go through--well, you know, as much as a piece of fiction can open your eyes. i am on the lookout for something new to read.
But most often people get stuck with the behaviours or practices and lose the intent behind them. For example the spirit behind fasting or pranayama is lost in the process of actually skipping meals and controlling breath. If one could look at the available variations and associated reasons within just these two – one would easily get swayed by the sheer number of methods available. When the spirit is lost the activity does not elevate the person and hence the philosophical portions always remain just an intellectually stimulating experience.
Nothing is ever too banal or beastly for Rupert’s papers to print, but in grubbing around in the Strauss-Kahn’s trash cans, they seem to have missed a couple of points.
Please package them carefully in sandwich baggies, so as to avoid losing any to random sidewalks or sentencing them to a life under the front seat of the car. Should you have entire pre-packaged bags of black jelly beans (and if you hate them so, I can only believe you purchased them with evil in mind), please let me know in advance so I can be sure to have enough black jelly bean-loving foster homes prepared to accept them.
Here's to being off or behind schedule, having a somewhat dirty house and not getting everything done that you want! And here's to having happier children and a more fulfilling experience being a parent!
So, my dear people pleaser/doormat, if you’re serious about attracting that love relationship you’ve been hoping for for so long, it’s time to transform your relationship with yourself FIRST because HE is going to be a reflection of YOU. Become the Love Goddess so that you can attract that Love God you so deserve.
“When looking for the wood lice thing,” my friend continued, “I did notice and thought of getting a thing that would keep cats and foxes and…”
Z: "AAAAAAAAAAAAAA man, oh man, Nathanael, AAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA, oh man. Come on, I was sleeping man"
It’s the delicata squash I picked up at Whole Foods a few weeks ago! I’ve never had delicata before, but since it’s not uncommon for squashes to be turned into sweet dishes (by roasting them with brown sugar and cinnamon, for example), I thought it would pair nicely with pears (homophones!), and so, at 9am yesterday morning, I started hacking it apart. First, I cut it in half, lengthwise, and scooped out the seeds:
Three nights only: April 4, 5, 7
Still, one of my favorite tracks on the album is Harold Arlen’s familiar “I’ve Got The World On A String” where some subtle piano work by Mr. Melvoin and Bill Goodwin’s precise drumming support Basse’s subtle vocal. The piano break is a little long on a four and a half minute studio version. It would have worked better on a concert recording of eight to nine minutes, no doubt.
I don't understand how Zales can really expect you to pay thousands of dollars for a ring that the diamonds fall out of and then THEY damage it even more and refuse to fix it. At this point I have to order an entirely new ring made in my size and that will take six to eight weeks for it to get here.
Fossgate is a real find, actually. There’s the beautiful Merchant’s Hall; the MacDonalds set in a fantastic old cinema (but a furniture shop, not the burger bar…); and a host of quirky individual shops. A great addition to a day-out in York, and one more tourists should find…
On the other side of this coin are the Christians who flaunt their alcohol consuming ability. They look down on their brothers and sisters in Christ and refuse to conform their conduct to the conscience of their fellow believers. Not only this, but these people often take pride in their drinking and this can sometimes appear as teenage bragging.
Remember this adorable couple? A little while ago, I was lucky to become part of a special group of the most creative and talented women I have met in a while. We share one common thread, our love for Prince Edward Island and a desire to showcase the talents that exist within it. We combined out passions to create a styled wedding shoot showcasing the beauty and uniqueness of our island. I was lucky to be the set designer.
Einar Örn Benediktsson & President Bongo of GusGus on Stage performing the song "If you don't jump (you're English)" @ NASA venue @ Iceland Airwaves '07. EÖB was there as Ghostigital (a Duo with Curver Thoroddsen). That's the fun of the Airwaves festival. Different Icelandic artists together on stage, doing unexpected things.
All that was left of them,
Peres Projects, Los Angeles
Master Aetheris
“If you’re not failing every now and again, it’s a sign you’re not doing anything very innovative.” Woody Allen
The event had started and ended in Butlins, Minehead. After putting on some dry clothes we sat at a cafe to refuel and silently surveyed the hideous nightmare of a Butlins weekend in full flow. Suddenly my puncture experience didn’t seem quite so bad!
Guinea pigs are not pets in other parts of the world - it just seems so wrong, but I am sure that is just social conditioning. They live, according to one website, on average 5-10 years, but according to most others, 5-7 years. Pinky was 6 and half.
There’s a sub-plot with a foster boy next door that shows his tender side, which she likes, but also makes Cowboy believe maybe he isn’t father material after all – and since it’s obvious to him that Melody doesn’t want him (she worked hard enough to show him that), he finally gives up and leaves, promising to share custody and pay child support, but leaving her free to find a man she can love to marry.
19 same
We are still a long way from done but at least we've started. I'll try to get some pics uploaded tomorrow showing our progress so far, and while I'm at it share a few "before" pictures of some of my thrifty finds.
A fair bit. Rejection, self-doubt, people telling you you can’t do it, that it’s all an impossible dream: these are problems that beset the best of writers. But here’s the thing: if you truly want to write then these things won’t deter you. They won’t matter because writing is what you do, it’s who you are, it burns within you. If you’re a writer worthy of that name, you will always write, whether you get published or not. I know that, even if I had never got that deal, I’d still be tapping away at my keyboard. Why? Because I have to. I have stories to tell and they just won’t leave me alone until I spill them out on the page. Writing is not really a vocation for me - it’s an urge, a need, an impulse almost as irresistible as breathing.
Day 1: Little Bear by Elise Minarik, info from Childcraft:World & Space, and pictures from The Moon by Michael George
Patterson suffered from shoulder discomfort during spring training, so he was placed on the Tacoma disabled list but did not report to the Rainiers. Instead, he was working with the training staff in Arizona building arm strength.
Yes. The cd was released by Dark Descent whereas the vinyl has come out one month ago or something like that for the Italian Iconoclast records did it. Agipunk is distributing the 500 copies, 100 of which are "die-hard" versions: splatter vinyl plus patch.
The only reason that I can think of why Michael Haneke has decided to do an American remake of his 1997 film, Funny Games, is because he really, really likes fucking with his audience. The first Haneke film I saw, The Time of the Wolf, lost me video rental privileges in my apartment for at least a month. The second, Cache, was one of my favorite films of 2006. Funny Games is like Cache, in that it uses the medium of film itself to implicate the viewer in what's going on onscreen. The premise is simple - a family is vacationing at their lake house when two young men appear at the door and take them hostage. The villains (Peter & Paul/Tom & Jerry/Bevis & Butt-Head) aren't motivated by theft, rape, or anything other than sadism. It's a recipe for a very sick movie, especially since the director is a genius at ratcheting up the tension (his films are worth re-watching just for the framing). But Haneke really goes the extra mile here with the interlocking use of two devices.
Writers aren't like writers on TV (Liz Lemon: "One time I laughed at a blind guy eating spaghetti! Sometimes I pee in the shower if I'm really tired! I saw my grandparents making love once and didn't leave right away!") or the movies (Mary Fisher: "He held her body as he had for a millenium with an ease neither of them had ever, ever known. He reached for her...nub...love...button!"). But my friend Cathie enjoys pretending they are. Specifically, she likes pretending I am. So I probably should have known what I was in for when we decided to indulge our John Cusack jones. We went to The Raven last night with her son, August, and it was pretty terrific. The other show, I mean, the Cathie-and-MJ show, not The Raven. The Raven sucked ass.
near petrified. He was below, turning the spare room
Then I was showered with Homemade cards from our children. This is truly what makes a Holiday for me. I will be sad when they no longer want to do this. It brings a few tears to my eyes each year. I don't need or like money spent on me I just need thoughtfulness and that is exactly what I got this year and it was perfect.
Here is what the mamas said they wish they would have known more about before baby:
This is the display that Beryl and Igor brought for us to peruse. They will be back to teach a full workshop on Saturday, but I'm committed to Kiernan's Little League and am sorry to miss this learning opportunity.
P.S. *Those new to the term, biwi means wife..
On Wednesday I will be having a doctors appointment to see if I have a stress fracture in my right foot. See how I conveniently scheduled that appointment AFTER the 5k race and the soccer game? If you are going down, you might as well go down in flames....Cathie B if you are reading this I can see those eyes rolling!
I went ahead and purchased another camera. It is a Panasonic Lumix DMC GF1 kit. It was a good price, has two lenses, three filters, camera bag, 16MB card, battery charger, blahblahblah. This is about six months ahead of when I was planning on purchasing another camera.
Preparation:
as she leads you away to new places.
**Button Loops- attach w/ sl st around post of sc on WS of trim, ch6, sl st around next post, cut off, tuck ends, sew button opposite of loop.
The last 20 miles were a war of attrition. I found myself preferring the climbing to descending as it gave a chance to warm up my frozen bones. I eventually made it to the finishing line in 5 hours & 5 minutes where I was able to calculate that my puncture repair had taken 15 minutes, and not the hour it had felt. I was only 20 minutes behind Andy, 6 minutes ahead of Justin and 13 ahead of Rachel putting us all in the top 100 of over 700 entrants. A great result all round, but also some real lessons in suffering.
*Notification of acceptance or revision: November 1, 2012
Hazelhurst bluesman!
■ borrow money to buy your home – you must apply the test on the assumption that you did borrow money to buy the home
4. Après Moi 5:26
THE RITUAL - SALVADORE RITCHIE
"I know, Scully," he said hugging her, "you are speechless in light of my brilliant discovery." He led her in the direction of the snowman in the middle of the yard. "Finally, their mission done here, the aliens then erected this edifice in the shape of a snowman - a geographical marker to signal the Mother ship."
Christ, I didn’t even know there was a Boston, Maine.
Jamie grins, I prefer the more modern stuff, "White stripes anyone?"
So, Where Do You Want To Go?
They proceeded past another brass door to be greeted by the most curious sight. A small mechanical spider constructed in brass and with a precious gem set into what passed for its head clattered its way towards Se’rith and Brelyna. It seemed to move awkwardly but there was nothing awkward in its subsequent leap, the way it dug its brass legs into Se’rith’s arm or the wicked cackle it emitted. Clearly the Synod member out side had been assaulted by one of these constructs. Se’rith cursed herself for not reading up on the Dwemer in the Arcaneum before they left. Yet like the brass giant they disposed of in Shimmermist Cave this spider also fell apart under a magical barrage. It did not seep blood though rather a black, viscous liquid dropped out of it. Se’rith collected some in an empty vial for later investigation as they pressed on.
less dots for flatter ground, and more dots for hills and mountains.
Oh I don’t want to get into the nitty-gritty, the this and that but this site has been contacted, indeed independent nationalists such as myself have been courted over the years by individuals from all sides but I must say now publicly as I have privately, we want no part, no part in the war of ego, the war of curtailment. Indeed it may very well be called the war of curtailment and it has been ongoing and exceedingly effective for some time now, there has always been one side or the other, the so-called hardliner and the moderniser, the old guard and the new, yet for those who look behind the shenanigans who know a little they can just, just determine the hidden hand.
I found your profile on Writers.net and I would like to take a moment and introduce myself and my company My name is Dan Grogan and I am a Literary agent and co-owner of Best Solution Author Agency. At Best Solution we relieve authors of all the business worries, so that writers have the time to do what writers do best - WRITE.
Proposed Work Overview:
- melted margarine, for brushing
Wilde’s intent with De Profundis was originally unclear to me. Was it to blame, to guilt or was it something else? Wilde appears almost contradictory at times, shifting blame, shifting emotions. His letter was only written a page at a time throughout his sentence, and he even claims, “My nature is seeking a fresh mode of self-realization” (57), and as we, the reader, take in Wilde’s words, he is making new realizations about himself and about his lover.
After being in Kinshasa, the Addis Ababa airport almost felt like home. It was very modern, and had shops, restaurants, restrooms, and air conditioning! I know that when you venture away from the airport, the poverty is staggering, but this airport was night and day different from Kinshasa’s!
PS. The manabase depends on how you build your deck, but I advice you to focus plenty on the green mana, since you need to use important cards like Mulch, Tracker’s Instinct, and Avacyn’s Pilgrim early in the game.
golf cart rides
I lit yr. cigarette,/
In need of some revamping your home or office space after the new year? I look forward to January for several reasons. It's a time to get reorganized AND revamped! Give me a call if you're interested in booking for January.
The Moon and Sixpence is based loosely on the painter’s life as a stockbroker who forsakes everything – family, home, reputation – to pursue his burgeoning artistic inclinations. Upon first meeting Charles Strickland (Gauguin) the anonymous 23 year-old narrator, who is also a writer, thinks him unremarkable in every particular but a rather “good, dull, honest, plain man” with a docile “pleasant, hospitable” wife of 17 years and two “nice-looking” children. After the meeting, he surmises the Stricklands by saying: “They would grow old sensibly; they would see their son and daughter come to years of reason, marry in due course – the one a pretty girl, future mother of healthy children; the other a handsome, manly fellow, obviously a soldier; and at last, prosperous in their dignified retirement, beloved by their descendants, after a happy, not un-useful life, in the fullness of their age they would sink into the grave.” No prediction could have been further from the truth. Shortly after meeting the couple, the narrator becomes unwittingly entangled in the tortuous plexus of their lives when Strickland suddenly abandons his wife. Distraught she enlists the stranger to seek out her husband in Paris, where he is purported to have fled. Amy Strickland bids the narrator farewell, saying: “Tell him that our home cries out for him. Everything is just the same, and yet everything is different. I can’t live without him. I’d sooner kill myself. Talk to him about the past, and all we’ve gone through together. What am I to say to the children when they ask for him? His room is exactly as it was when he left it. It’s waiting for him. We’re all waiting for him.”
I remember the day it was announced publicly that Freddie had Aids. It was one of the worst kept secrets at that point – but I had lived in hope.
Bullock, the ADL's top "fact finder" had sold confidential information to a South African intelligence agent in San Francisco for $15,000.
It’s certainly no secret that many stars in the world of music, sports, acting, perhaps other creative areas, have been taken advantage of by unscrupulous or just greedy executives, managers, agents, or their own lawyers because the clients don’t understand or know what to look for in the fine print of a rich contract. They just sign the deals, trusting that the people they’re working with or who are working for them will do what’s in their best interest, and when they find out they’re getting screwed over it’s too late.
So DH had to go into work to Muster and I waited for him to get home so I could show him. We were so happy. After hubby knew I called my parents but no answer, so I went to the back yard and start mowing the lawn that had grown into a jungle while we were on leave. As I was mowing I was surrounded by a bunch of dragonflies. I'd like to think they are from Laken telling me everything will be ok. Dave and I well I told Dave that if this little one is a girl her theme is going to be dragonflies. When I came back inside My mom called back, my mom was ecstatic and she swears I'm having twins (we'll find out on the 23rd this month). Another sign we had that this was going to be our month was the double rainbow that the ends of the rainbows were visible on the 4th of July.
-Have a typical career in most respected organization.
3 conversely
Source: Borrowed from my local library
Since coming home, I have been doing so much cooking, which has made me so happy! It's nice to take a little break and do those activities that make me really happy. One recipe I prepared this week was a variation from The Paleo Diet Cookbook by Loren Cordain, Ph.D. It's a wonderful cookbook because a lot of the recipes seem light and fresh, which is the perfect remedy to counter those heavy holiday foods. I made his Paleo Tilapia Tacos with some alterations because my parents don't like really spicy foods. I changed the seasonings to accommodate and added more vegetables as well. I also altered the methodology too, mainly because the pan I was using did not allow for me to just move the vegetables over to cook the fish in a single layer.. I also didn't want the garlic to burn! It was a really great recipe, but what really made it even better for me is adding some lime juice on top of the fish. I think it really needed acidity, because I'm trying to follow his advice and really cut back on the salt, which can be difficult but necessary.
Darker Still is being published by Sourcebooks in November.
Studio - Maida Vale 3
Something that I missed out on after moving away from Baltimore was the plethora of events that Baltimore Beer Week 2010 had. I didn't know if the BBW 2011 (October 6-16) could match the intensity, but then I looked at the events. As with last year, many events are pay as you go special tap events hosted by the numerous beer bars throughout town, along side the special events that cost a bit of money.
I can see his face is shocked.
On the eye - Rubied espresso. Vampire coffee.
Is your hard drive running nice and quietly? Do you miss the awful clicking sound of a floppy disk trying to read all 200 megabytes of information stored on it? Well then, all your hard drive needs is a nice smack on the ground to create nice constant clicking and grinding sounds. You can even follow the rhytm with your fapping of the pixilated porn stored on said drive, if you can still read it that is...
I also hated (which is a good thing and goes to show what a great playwriter Agbaje is) the fact that on the way home I still had the last scenes playing on my mind because all of the themes in the play rang true.
badly.
I have another child who seems to take pride in getting on everyone's last nerve lately....including mine! Yes, I love him dearly, but it is still possible for someone you love to get on your nerves!
1. There are 2 lines in red. This is your blog address. Insert YOUR URL in place of mine - in both places.
Let your Love of God be present in all that you do, think, feel and desire. It is this for which you have been longing. The fulfillment of this longing cannot be found outside of you, it is within you and by the experiences you have undertaken, no matter how unpleasant or painful they may be or have been, it has brought you to this place where you now stand, poised, on the brink of the manifestation of wonders and happenings never before seen or experienced in this Universe.
The knife aside, I find this sheath system to be so excellent that I am tempted to make a kydex sheath with harness slots cut to use it with other knives like my Boker Trench. In fact, I think that once some folks get a hold of these sheaths that folks would buy the harness alone. With wider harnesses, this could take off like the popular Tek Lock.
Her cutty sark (short shirt), o' Paisley harn,
They all have difficulty with the back stroke, so Miss Alex finally just took them out of the water and had them practice standing up:
A thousand spans of outstretched wings
Cos the mills are dead now mate
But it’s not.
515 Monmouth Street, Suite 302
I was seventeen. I'd just broken up with my first boyfriend and my soon-to-be second boyfriend was hot on his heels. He had their first album and he played it all the time when we were in his bedroom. When I hear Driftwood I see grey bed sheets and a swish black minidisk player in the corner. I see an open clothes rack with suits and blue shirts on it, a Kandinsky print on the wall. My second boyfriend was not a school boy but a 'real man' with an office job. I felt awkward.
(Actually, I'm just scared of going to an unknown hairdresser. Only used the one back home, she knew what to do. Me, I have no idea what she did, so don't know what to ask for.)
While I was at it, I cancelled my massage on Wednesday morning. (It turned out that my masseuse was quitting, and I had missed my last session with her). I also cancelled a meeting on Thursday morning and send my apologies to College Council meeting and Academic Staff Meeting. Everyone got back saying not to worry and wishing me to get well soon. Regrettably, I had to cancel a drink with two colleagues after the ASM. I was so much into it that I felt I could cancel everything.
Meghan (4 years 4 months): From previous visits to the Saint Louis Zoo, Meghan knew animal-shaped lollypops were available in the gift shop. Upon arrival for her latest visit, Meghan asked for a lollypop and Grandpa agreed, but then repeatedly, over the following hour or more, Meghan kept asking. Finally Grandpa told her that she would get a lollypop, but that he didn’t want to hear the word lollypop again until they got to the gift shop at the zoo exit. Thereafter, if one listened carefully, Meghan could be heard saying softly to herself, “I’m getting a lollypop, I’m getting a lollypop.” (#457)
Who are we if we abandon things like hope and love?
Warrant officer Sam Tselanyane said that the Colt bakkie’s registration showed that it belonged to a former police officer of Rustenburg who had resigned as a cop in February this year. It is believed that this person also formed part of the farm-attack gang firing at Oosthuizen and Tselanyane claimed that this man had ‘undertaken to turn himself in’. However by the time the newspaper was put to bed, this had not yet happened, reports Beeld. Another suspect, 36-years old, was arrested in Ipelegeng township outside Schweizer-Reneke. Another suspect remains missing. The privately-owned Cold-bakkie contained various items which were of great interest to the investigating police: the ex-cop’s police appointment certificate, the woman constable’s appointment certificate, a police-issue flashlight, two hand-radios and an orange emergency light. A suspect’s driver’s license, a police-issue Z88-pistol and a magazine containing 15 live bullets also were confiscated.
“We’re supposed to be splitting up to get this done faster,” I said. “You know, so we don’t die at the hands of an evil villain.”
Even the Tarahumara tribesmen in the book, "Born to Run" wear hand-made Huaraches, constructed of car tire treads. While not "cushy," they still offer a large (1/2" thick rubber) degree of protection from rocks and "sharps" to the bottoms of the feet. Barefoot Ted, a character in the book, sustained somewhat "shredded" feet after 50-miles (on desert trails), while wearing his Vibram FiveFingers. And we've had local runners' break their little toes while wearing Vibram 5Fs on our rocky trails.
Words can't describe
Neither of them said anything for a while. Diane thought John seemed a little calmer than he had been before she spoke out. He'd turned off the motorway. They had just passed a sign for Sheffield. They were driving down a steep-sided valley, through an avenue of trees. She opened the map, hoping to locate the place: she felt comforted, absorbing herself in something so normal. She soon found the road on the map: a red line heading towards a strip of blue, a lake between hills. Once they got into the hills they hadn’t got a lot further to go to get to the house. What would they do when they arrived? She craved normality: talking to friends about books, music, films, politics. She was looking forward to the mysterious pleasure one can feel inhabiting an unfamiliar place. The usual associations with the immediate past are temporarily erased. It seems, temporarily, as if the future might be different.
This is the way doxologies work. First they say something about God and then they ascribe attributes about God. The attributes you ascribe account for the thing you are excited about.
“John.” The Doctor spoke more firmly trying to gain the mans attention. John finally looked up. Flat seemingly unseeing eyes stared up at him set against an ashen pallor. Dr. Logan suppressed a shiver. John’s eye discoloration unnerved and fascinated the staff. Unnerved because they resembled the eyes of morgue patients. Fascinated because John had perfect 20/20 vision. The orderlies liked to call John dead eyes until Dr Logan over heard a staff member refer to him by the demeaning name and put a stop to it. Dr Logan hated when staff made fun of patients and their maladies and even chastised other Doctors for their insensitive remarks so much, that he was given several less then flattering names as well. All behind his back of course.
Be Inspired by the Animals!
In most cases the subject (interviewer or guest) is facing slightly left or right of the camera. This shows that the subject is talking to someone else (not the viewer), but by being relatively front-on the viewer is still part of the conversation.
TDH and Insan Association were unable to estimate the size of the Dom community in Lebanon, but their research suggests there are 3,112 living in the Lebanese cities of Beirut, Sidon and Tyre. “Many more Dom communities exist within Lebanon, particularly in Tripoli and the Bekaa,” Hope said.
One of the signs of a healthy language is the large number of books written on the subject. Last month saw the release of Scala for the Impatient, an excellent introduction to the language for programmers who already know a language like Java, C# or Ruby. If you’ve been thinking about learning Scala this is a no-nonsense introduction.
In Greece second place went to Olympic and World Champion Shelly Ann Fraser in an outstanding 10.89, yet she was barely in the picture! Such was Jeter's dominance in this race. Out well, but still behind Fraser who typically owns the start, Jeter began a drive at 30 meters that never ended as she blew past the field and simply kept going to the tape. With nary a waver in her stride she eclipsed and outstanding field - leaving the 5th (Fraser) and 7th (Kerron Stewart) fastest women in history looking very mortal in her wake. In short, Jeter's performance was nothing short of Boltian in nature!
“Eighteen.” It just slipped out. I couldn’t believe I'd just lied about my age.
"Dear Heav'ly Father, thanks food, bless daddy, thanks watermelon, thanks poppa. Amen."
Reduced hearing can be caused by many different factors, but one of the simplest, yet overlooked factors is ear wax. Ear wax is produced by the ear itself and is meant to protect the ear from water or infection. The amount of wax produced varies by each person, and unfortunately, some people are more prone to having an excess amount of wax than others.
The name ‘New Forest’ originates from its enclosure by the conquering Norman King William I for hunting deer – indeed, the word ‘forest‘ in English was originally a legal term to describe an area of land set aside for hunting by nobility – in which poaching of the King’s deer was punishable in a number of gruesome ways including blinding or having the hands cut off. The restrictions on the use of the Forest by local people, and the harsh rule of William Rufus (William the Conqueror’s son and heir) led to huge resentment, which has been suggested as one of many possible motives for William’s death: in a still-unsolved mediaeval ‘whodunnit’, William may have been murdered by a ‘stray’ arrow fired by Walter Tyrell who somewhat suspiciously immediately fled to France.
A persistent racial theme in his work states that the problems of the black community (and he acknowledges there are some) have more to do with federal government policies than with what we customarily refer to as racial discrimination. For Prof. Williams, state sovereignty, and even secession, are remedies to an overbearing federal bureaucracy.
In a previous post, I mentioned making your own trellis for your peas to grow up. Now, there are tons of different ways you can do this and all of them will probably work great. After all, peas do not care what their trellis looks like, only that it is suitable for them to grab onto and grow up. Last year, my daughter and I made a trellis out of posts and rope and it worked great. It was not the most beautiful thing, but we had so much fun making it that I thought we would do the same again. The best part is that there was no out-of-pocket expense because I had everything I needed in my garden shed.
by his wack conspiracy theories
Thank you for reading this message. Please inform others of the opportunity.
(As far as re-activating the ovaries once they have failed, due to using up the store of eggs, please see the Addendum below at the end of this post.)
Cartea urmeaza sa fie lansata pe 29 Mai.
As a child living in the islands finding coral on the beach was my weekly goal. Forays in glass bottom boats to see coral and sea creatures such as urchins and sting rays was always on top of my list to things to do. I was never bored by going over and over, as the sea is forever changing.
What? Why did I say that? Well lets start with something else first. While Dr. Food was away again in San Diego I made this stuffed potato. It is from Gimme Some Oven I had to make it. Looked right up my alley.
It'd be nice to be a professional student; I love accents, but can't figure out why people can't understand me when I say something like "coffee" or "laundry"; Books are the way to my heart, followed closely by food; I think life is sad without at least a little whimsy; I aim to never mature above 5-years-old, at least in some way; Mayonnaise is my mortal enemy, the Dr. Horrible to my Captain Hammer (because Nathan Fillion rules); I'm constantly convinced someone or something is watching me like I'm on TV; being double-jointed isn't nearly as sexy as it sounds and I can make people turn green far easier than turning them on; Love me, love my duck hamper; I can stare at a wall and entertain myself, it's one of the glories of being a daydreamer; I love old B-horror movies;
I love the bliss of narcotics in the middle of the night when pain awakens me.
A little bit of time, but now I am counting the days and getting away, all
The main problem with The Atlantic's snarky suggestion is not that it involves a subsidy--but that the subsidy only goes to the purchase of gasoline. But what if $190B, or some other figure, were made available to instead subsidize energy or transportation? What if every taxpayer got a lump-sum tax credit to offset rising energy costs, one that wasn't tied to any particular form of energy?
Thanks Carrisa for putting this awesome magazine together; and for choosing my creations to be part of it!
I made two.The first one im not gonna tell anyone, i know, chicken...kvack,kvac.
273. Raw Almonds in the Beer Jeep @ Rt 422 E, I-76 E, & Rt 476 S – 11:58 p.m.
Hello 11 pounds of water! Pack, you were so light before! Feet, keep up, we’re hiking again…remember? Twenty minutes later the feet give up complaining and walk uphill.
The Paris Carnival
“Circus!” she snorted. “Yer call all that prancin’ about with bare-legged hussies a circus? I been in many a real one in my day, so I knows the difference. Yer better come in then.”
I'm surprisingly calm-- what good will it do for me to fret or go into a panic mode? I reminded B that I cannot rescue him. He is angry at himself for losing his TV and that he might not save the money quick enough to get his X-Box out of the pawn shop. But, we both agree that they are just "things". If he truly gets himself back on track, and stays clean, then he can afford to buy them again.
Contractor: Really.
Like I said, "when I first saw this." Then I poked around some more -- and it's a huge document, with even more incredibly sub-divided categories (meaning many more medals...) -- and found some other stuff. Like Ordinary Bitter (3.0-4.1% ABV), English-Style Summer Ale (3.6-5%), Scottish-style Light Ale (2.8-3.5%!), English-style Pale Mild and Dark Mild (both 3.2-4.0%), Classic Irish-style Dry Stout (3.8-5%), Berliner Weisse (2.8-3.4%), Leichtes Weizen (2.5-3.5%), Belgian-style Table Beer (0.5%-3.5%!), and German Leicht(bier) (2.5-3.6%). (I'm skipping the American Light categories on purpose, yeah.)
The winds of change are blowing through Thebes. A devastating palace fire has killed the 18th dynasty’s royal family— all with the exception of Nefertari, niece of the reviled former queen Nefertiti. The girl’s deceased family has been branded as heretical, and no one in Egypt will speak their names. A relic of a previous reign, Nefertari is pushed aside, an unimportant princess left to run wild in the palace. But all of this changes when she is taken under the wing of pharaoh’s aunt, and brought to the Temple of Hathor where she is educated in a manner befitting a future queen.
Nom, nom, nom. (That’s the sound the zombies make, too…)
– Hamas Charter
It should be obvious to everyone. The point of Roberts' criticism isn't exclusively focused on the translation. The heart of his conviction is his belief that Vatican II created a new church, with a new kind of worship, and this ought to take the place of what came before. In Roberts new church there is no such thing as a distinction between priest and people. Everyone in the pew is now their own priest. To follow Roberts' logic, we must conclude that He Who before Vatican II was the same yesterday, today and forever, is now someone very different. And Tom Roberts likes it that way, and wants to call it Catholicism.
and by the time I leave, I look just fine.
“The second, shorter piece, ‘Valley of the Stones,’ was assembled from some of the remaining improvisations that were not utilized for the first. In addition, Wavespan added some processed field recordings to complete the mix.
Farnham White Bines grown at Canterbury in Kent were called Canterbury White Bines, and white bines grown at Mathon, Worcestershire were called Mathon White Bines or simply Mathons (14). Though the last white bines in Farnham were grubbed up in 1929, Canterbury White Bines and Mathons are still grown to this day, though they're both sold (to brewers, if not to hop merchants) as Goldings.
- Not from concentrate lemon juice
3 loaves (or pieces) of bazlama bread, a huge bunch of mint, a giant head of lettuce, a large head of mesculin, a bunch of parsley and a kilo of Ankara pears. All of this cost 8 lira, or $5. A super bargain. I wall be going back to that market for fresh greens, especially since it is so nice and quiet.
Having infiltrated the American-Arab Anti-Discrimination Committee (ADC), the ADL's "fact finder" performed a COINTEL-type operation at the convention of the Holocaust-denying Journal of Historical Review when he put ADC's literature on convention tables as a way of smearing the committee for "working with anti- Semites."
Once a fishing village, Cassis is now a fashionably charming mooring for yachts and centre for sea trips. I wrote about it several times when I first started this blog - it has, after all, a relevance to The Lantern - and then haven't returned because I haven't returned in real life either for the past couple of years.
I share because I care. Bless your heart.
This was a tablescape from our church's Harvest Tea several years ago.
My father never stopped being a parent for me. Just because I became an adult, didn’t mean I didn’t need him anymore. He was a good, honest, hardworking man who loved his family. All he wanted was for me to be happy. I try to take a page from his life and remember that when raising my daughter.
US paperwork done, we grab a cab to our Best Western Carib Beach Hotel with thoughts of long, aggressively-scrubbed hot showers dancing in our heads. We hafta wait a bit before our room is ready, then we discover that the hot water in the shower is random and brief; but it’s the tropics and a tepid shower is ok. Not what I hoped for but ok. So we’re back in the US of A. Hamburgers are mentioned as a dinner possibility and we ask about a nearby good burger place. The front desk has some suggestions but when we run the numbers, it’s gonna cost us about $50 each to get a hamburger because of taxi prices and we can go eat at the upscale sister Best Western hotel’s nouvelle Italian restaurant for less. Ok, we take the free shuttle to the good Best Western (where the rooms are at least twice as much), and settle in for some al fresco nouvelle Italian.
If you make and post anything that I came up with, please post a link to my blog. If you sell any items on my website that was my idea, then you must post a link giving me credit (after asking permission to sell first).
The Playstation 4 would also need to have some serious graphics memory inside it to cope with outputting to such high-resolution screens as 4K.
on the phone to me yesterday without
Does anybody hear her? Can anybody see?
7. What was your nickname in high school?
dormir con una morena.
30 Box Jumps 30/26″ 20 Deadlifts 315/205# 30 T2B 20 DB Push Press 50/35# 30 GHD Situps 20 Row for Calories 30 Alternating Weighted Pistols 25/15# (DB) 20 Burpee Box Jumps 30/26″
I leave you with this amusing song, only the song is amusing not the meaning.
Valery gave this chair some added 'oomph' which is such a weird word. Does anyone ever use that term in everyday life? Doubtful. Nonetheless, she oomphasized it and accessorized it with a snazzy little chevron pillow, and the whole thing is adorbs. See it on her blog Merry Go Round Boutique.
The chronic need to urinate at night, a condition called nocturnal enuresis, also causes bedwetting by young children.
Donald Kirkpatrick’s Levels of Evaluation (Response/Reaction-Learning-Transfer of Learning/Change in Behavior-Impact/Business Results-Return on Investment)
PAGE International Screenwriting Contest.
The people of France should be outraged; the Israeli entity has committed a series of criminal terrorist murders on French soil, in order to sway popular opinion to support further Zionist criminality and bloodshed. The murder of serving paratroopers was to galvanise support for military reprisals; the murder of children by a 'Palestinian-sympathiser' was for the purpose of justifying actions against Palestinians. The fact that a Rabbi and three children were sacrificed to generate this Jewish propaganda highlights the mentality of the Zionist entity.
While there, these lovely rubber boots called out to me.
Books I Hope to Read in April
Secular, worldly images. Figurative Islamic Art. In Spain. 10th c. Griffins, Lions, Ivory, men on Horse. Regarding pictures of Mohammed, Muslims feared doing.
First, Americans are nearly twice as likely to say the United States should put greater emphasis on the development of alternative energy supplies such as wind and solar power (59%) as to say the U.S. should emphasize production of more oil, gas, and coal supplies (34%). This is the case even though Republicans are more likely to favor production of traditional energy sources over alternative energy.
My favourite pieces of music include Reflections of Passion by Yanni, Beethoven’s Ode to Joy, and Strauss’s Blue Danube.
I can't wait to move. I really can't wait. I need to get as far away from my family, and all of their issue and drama.
(thinking)
So our 52 Pages is almost at an end, and many people have asked me if I am doing a prompt challenge next year...well I am...sort of. I will try and explain what I am going to do, and then if you would like to join in that would be wonderful.
For anyone who’s had to suffer through happy hour with me the last couple years, you know how much I enjoy working at Farrar, Straus and Giroux. And it’s been great producing Work in Progress and coordinating campaigns with authors like John Jeremiah Sullivan, Amy Waldman, Jonathan Franzen, and Jeffrey Eugenides.
I hadn’t seen most of the people I went to school with since I moved away after the 10th grade. I made sure my hair was longer for the occasion, just to show people I hadn’t lost any. Many people didn’t even recognize me. I was voted the “Person Who Had Changed The Most” and got a picture frame as a prize. When I went up to get it, someone yelled out, “I was wondering who invited Kenny Rogers!”
The state of al Qaeda is that of a loosely run terror organization that tried to pull in and centralize its operations for some efficiencies but was unable to bounds on that overhead. It isn't that it will become a nice, bureaucratic organization: it won't. It is on the path towards increasing ineffectiveness, however, because of its bureaucracy. The twin sociologies involved or Arabic culture and the culture of bureaucracy has been the downfall of every large scale organization in the Middle East. That is because of the way that Arabs view their own people, their own culture and the requirement to keep both under control from any organization that starts up, large or small.
line -up :
When the students arrived the next week, they were laughing and talking with a completely different demeanor from the previous week when they where somber, sad and angry. The students reported having used TFT throughout the week. All of them explained that they did not participate in any fights during the week. They all told of using tapping when feeling scared.
I was so happy with how it all turned out & even better that Leesa really loved it. I think I'm going to have to make another one for me too. Hope you like it too. If you have any questions, please leave me a comment.
Old and new!
(Laughs) I oversee all my projects and deal with portions of the information but I delegate the responsibilities as well and hire people for certain positions. A lot of my employees are actually smarter than me and have achieved a higher level of education. Some of them are even Harvard graduates. I put these guys in positions to run my companies.
All the details are at the end of my blog post.
Joffe M, Li Z. Male and female factors in fertility. Am J Epidemiol 1994; 140: 921-929.
This boy can seriously turn on the charm and pull heartstrings like nobody I have ever seen before, but he can rip the heart right out of my chest with three words.... He's going to cause serious trouble to the poor teenage girls in a few short years!
Fast forward three or four months. I was sitting outside of our bay in our company firebase in Baghdad. My PL took a seat next to me and said with a grizzled voice for a young PL “SPC Gomez, you turned 21 in Kuwait, right?”
I have a lot of bad things going on in my life right now. I feel drained and perhaps do let others pain in too much. I started having night terrors about death again and my therapist told me I am too empathetic to my father’s condition. I don’t understand that. Of course I am empathetic to my father’s condition. He’s dying. That’s terrifying. For him and me. And the rest of his loved ones.
He said there were millions of other genuine rakyat who are not been given that chance.
When wingnuts got some press recently by claiming that Obama’s birth certificate was a fake, Borowitz posted
But. some researchers have found that spots with sexual imagery take a 10% hit in “likability” vs. ads without racy images.
A lone Red Star, such a sweet, friendly, very curious little bird, and quite smitten with our dog Rowdy whom she no doubt thinks is a rooster...he is a pretty cocky little fellow after all.
Perhaps you were concerned that Napoleon the Dragon was nowhere in my photographs of France and Spain (or perhaps you don’t know who Napoleon the Dragon is and should therefore click on the link at the top of the page).
I was given brilliantly striped socks,
The answer to this phenomenal phenomenon?
into the ink. She had created a sacred space in her store so she would be
In our desire to have everyone ‘get along’; in placating them or respecting only their opinions, freedoms or beliefs – we give up our own. In not denying the one, we forfeit the right of the collective. Bad behavior runs rampant – tearing down, ripping the fabric of our beloved community. What was once safe – quickly becomes divisive and dangerously unstable.
“It’s just about him trying to come to terms with the modern world. You’ve got to imagine, it’s enough of a shock to accept the fact that you’re in a completely different time, but everybody you know is dead. Everybody you cared about. He was a soldier, obviously, everybody he went to battle with, all of his brothers in arms, they’re all dead. He’s just lonely. I think in the beginning it’s a fish out of water scene, and it’s tough. It’s a tough pill for him to swallow. Then comes trying to find a balance with the modern world.”
Greens - Grass, Emerald, Lush Green, Pink
because when catching a glimpse of our two daughters side-by-side,
And we find it really useful on occasions such as this
Today Valley’s picks are featured: Bridal Shower
This find was especially SWEET since I was able to share the find with a friend, her little boy, and my own teens.
Using a quarter-cup measure, drop the biscuits onto the prepared cookie sheet, patting them down slightly to smooth the tops. You should get 6 biscuits from this mix. Bake the biscuits at 375 degrees for 15 minutes, until set and lightly browned.
We watched this during pre-production and modeled Warren's ghost's make-up from Fever Night after it. It's very simple, just black and white on someone's face; that's all you need, and it's much scarier than the ghouls/zombies today. Actually, the whole movie is simple as hell... again, is the protagonist crazy? And it has an awesome score.
“One fundamental change in the way the firm has operated since the merger is that they moved away from the traditional lockstep compensation approach — where partners are basically paid in terms of tenure — and toward a star system in which the top moneymakers can out-earn their colleagues by a ratio of up to 10-to-1. Davis says the extremes shouldn’t define the system, though, and that the more ‘normal’ band is about 6-to-1. Still, it must chafe to be the guy who’s earning the ’1′ and knows it. Hard to see oneself as a ‘partner’ of the ’6s,’ let alone the ’10s.’”
Anglo-American is the world’s third largest mining company. It is controlled by the Rothschilds and South Africa’s Oppenheimer family. It owns both Engelhardt- which enjoys a near monopoly in global gold refining- and the DeBeers diamond monopoly. The current De Beers chairman is Nicky Oppenheimer. De Beers was indicted in 1994 for price-fixing by the US Justice Department. To this day company officials do not set foot on US soil for fear they may be nabbed by US authorities.
4. Indianapolis Colts
“They’re going for a mastery of technique, then a mastery over all the important details of service,” Freeman said. “It adds up to an incredibly elusive experience. It’s hard to manufacture splendidness. It seems as though they have something very difficult figured out.” And that giant siphon? There's a really beautiful slideshow about it at the NY Times, along with a YouTube video of the thing in operation:
Like his old friend and fellow outlaw Waylon Jennings, I’ve been listening to records recorded by Willie dating back to the days when he had short, slicked-back hair, dressed in a suit and tie onstage, and he looked very … businesslike.
There was some damage. My mom’s car has dents all over it. We couldn’t see them until Sunday when the car was dry, but they are there. My brother & SIL’s house also had some damage. They have some chunks of siding missing and the garage door has some dents, but luckily that seems to be the worst of the damage.
There Will Be Blood
“It took me a good year or so to come out of my shell,” Kevin said. When he was first dating his now wife, Sara, Kevin said he didn’t talk about their relationship on the air too often; he chats up his family life frequently now. Guy describes the show as part show business, part reality, so it’s common to hear the gang chaw about their lives outside of the studio box, making their spouses and significant others like other cast members when they call in with their two cents.
Pauline Victoria Aughe lives in paradise. Hawaii to be exact. There with her husband and son, she works as an author, personal trainer, inspirational speaker and blogger. She does all these things without arms or legs.
park that offers something for everyone.
8/1/2010 – 10/17/2010 (the date at which point I ceased the short strategy and liquidated positions): -34.35%
I used the blunt end of a bamboo skewer to stuff small amounts of fluff into the feet & arms first, before moving on to the legs & body. This gives definition to the parts & helps to draw apart & therefore flatten out the stitching. Be extremely careful, however, you don't want to accidently poke right through the felt!
“Dude, I just drove it home from work about twenty minutes ago. It drives fine.”
I've also realized while writing the last few posts just how passionate I am about business and making money in this creative field. I'm going to pick a day to write about business and making money with quilting each week.
1/2 C. butter
Lately, I’ve tried to convince myself that I would be better without the expectations of a monogamous relationship. I tried to do that when my college crush Isaac asked,
And it was nice to have a little quality time with B Baby too.
One night while I was Twittering I saw that Lisa tweeted something to Brad Meltzer. I jumped into the twit stream and asked Brad to Twitterduce me to Lisa. I don't know if he ever did but I did get a tweet from Lisa saying she would be doing signings in the Philly area in April. She suggested I come to one of those events.
Last night my planned cross training (outdoor soccer, finally!), was canceled, due to Lack.Of.Lights.
Pattern alterations or any design changes you made: None.
p.s. Jim Trelease has an amazing brochure on reading. I plan on passing them out at my Usborne Books booth this weekend.
restoring the building and creating an even better space, comments
A few minutes later, Biden is caught on video again telling the manager: “Why don’t you say something nice instead of being a smartass all the time? Say something nice.”
They come watching, turning, and seeing
While going through some of the channeling that have come through, I came across this one, channeled through the Angelic Realm. I’m sure it was not a “coincidence” that I stumbled upon this message. I am drawn to share it with you now. This message came through in 2009:
I know some of you are wondering if I’ve lost touch with reality. You may be thinking, “What I wouldn’t do just to get my husband to take out the trash or wash the dishes. She’s nuts!” The issue for me is not whether or not chores get done or if I can rely on Dave’s help at home. Instead, I’m concerned about spending time together. We’ve actually agreed to put all work aside by noon on weekends–just to guarantee time is spent doing what is necessary at home AND necessary for our relationship.
Kylie’s outburst reminds me of a lowland silverback who claimed to be Mick Jagger’s role model. This is what he said about the rubber-lipped crooner:
Delta Brainwave State (0.5-4 Hz)
Anyway, this week Sam, my son, who is *known* from his early blogging days, to Suburbia, arranged to meet up in a cafe that was fairly near to us all.
Oh well, back tomorrow, with a blog about... er... one of the above.
Hey, I know strawberries are considered healthy because they’re fruit… but we can make them so that the possible gains are outweighed by the sweetness and yumminess of the dessert!
Our sneaking-in techniques continued once the school year started, and I snuck in that night, too. I don’t remember exactly how we got to this, but I have a very clear memory of us both naked, and I was on top of FarmSlut. I’m sure we were dry humping a bit, and my dick was pressed flat against the outside of her vagina.
